Summary
"Set around an area of open mature grounds, neatly tucked away within a secluded and private cul de sac location off Merridale Road on the fringe of Wolverhampton City, therefore in ease of excellent commuter links and local amenities. This well-proportioned ONE BEDROOM second floor ap..."
RESIDENTIAL/COMMERCIAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY IN TETTENHALL 8 Apartments / 1 Commercial Unit
"This is a fantastic investment opportunity to acquire a modern FREEHOLD investment property comprising of 14 modern two bedroom apartments, five apartments with ensuites, all currently tenanted and providing a gross rental income of over £8,000 per calendar month (Over £96,000 per ann..."
"Fabulous Development opportunity for 64 apartments, on a site area of approximately 0.4 hectares (1 acre) calculated from Ordnance Survey. Location Situated close to the centre of Bilston with a good range of urban amenities within a mixed residential and commercial area together with easy mo..."
6 recently refurbished Apartments in a prime location leading into Wolverhampton City Centre. The 6 apartments are located in a former Office space on the Tettenhall Road. There are 3 two bedroom apartments and 3 one bedroom apartments. Schools and amenities very close by.
"Fine and Country present to the market this immaculate 4/5 bed semi detached modern bungalow located in a popular residential road in Ickenham. The property benefits from being completed updated by its current owners to offer fantastic open plan living kitchen area, with large sliding glass doors..."
"BUY- TO- LET OPPORTUNITY BLOCK OF FLATS 9 UNITS. A RANGE OF 1 BEDS, 2 BEDS AND 3 BEDS. MODERN, SPACIOUS, COMFORTABLE APARTMENTS. CONVENIENT PENN ROAD LOCATION. PRIVATE PARKING TO THE REAR."
"Royston and Lund are pleased to market this incredible 16th century farmhouse situated in Lower Penn, set over 4500sq ft. This property is a grade two listed building and displays original features of the property including the exposed beams. Lower Penn Farmhouse benefits from having three floors..."
"* The Woodlands * A magnificent 5-6 bedroom luxury detached new-build house within idyllic Tettenhall, presented to an exceptional standard throughout and highly energy-efficient. Featuring a stunning, open-plan family living kitchen and a detached double garage * Hall * Downstairs WC * Cloak/boo..."
"Exciting new development of just Four 5 bedroom luxury homes coming to the market now * Very high specification in a small gated community, off the Wrottesley Road * Bespoke kitchen and bathroom changes available * Plots in the £900s * Please register now if interested - Contact the office..."
"* An exceptionally well-appointed and capacious, modern 5-bedroom detached house in exclusive Tettenhall, finished to an immaculate standard with generous proportions throughout. Arranged over three floors with five en suite bedrooms, a south-facing garden, a double garage and a versatile studio ..."
An unusual development opportunity provided by a well appointed and well presented Tinacre Hill residence which has the potential for extensions (STPP) together with Planning Permission granted for the construction of a substantial two storey house to the rear of the plot with access off Perton R...
"Situated in one of the most sought-after locations in Tettenhall and enjoying a private corner position at the very end of Coppice Lane with no neighboring buildings, surrounded by greenery, and with a plot size of approx. 0.7 acres, this individually designed detached propert..."
An outstanding Victorian residence providing extensive and exceptionally well proportioned accommodation over three storeys in one of the most highly regarded addresses within the area.
"A beautifully appointed family residence, of generous proportions, standing in an enviable corner position, within an exclusive gated development (WOMBOURNE OFFICE)"
An outstanding Tettenhall Village residence with rooms of fine proportions throughout with a delightful southwest facing rear garden.
"**EXCEPTIONAL PLOT - SIZEABLE PLOT OF LAND TO REAR ASPECT NEEDING TO BE SEEN** A fine example of a traditional detached family residence with extensive living accommodation and six/seven bedroom accommodation set over three floors, whilst standing in a highly sought after area upon a ..."
An impressively proportioned and delightfully positioned 5 Bedroom modern style Detached Bungalow residence standing in gardens and ground of about 1.78 acres or thereabouts enjoying absolutely stunning panoramic farmland views from it elevated location. The property is approached through an elec...
"An amazing and rare opportunity to purchase and occupy a substantial detached residence which has also been previously extended to offer a staggering 8 bedrooms, 6 reception rooms, 4 bathrooms, garage, driveway and mature gardens. Converted from a family home in 1957 to being now currently used a..."
"An Immaculate Spacious Family Home in the Sought After Area of Tettenhall & The Wergs. Impressive from the front with excellent side views and rear views too, Enter the property into a light and bright hall, doors lead to the lounge, downstairs cloakroom and gym. The lounge opens up into the o..."
A prime development site with the benefit of PLANNING PERMISSION for 22 DWELLINGS plus aN EXISTING three-bedroom detached house (45 Rookery Road).
"* A very attractive and generously proportioned 4-bedroom traditional detached house on the outskirts of Tettenhall, within easy reach of local schools. Boasts a large private rear garden, master en suite, views across open fields, and a choice of distinctive reception spaces * Hall with orignal ..."
Amazing opportunity to acquire and Three Bedroom Semi Detached Home with excellent Transport Links and local Amenities. Located on the same road as Lanesfield Primary School this is an ideal Family home or Rental Investment. Call Now on to view!!!
Lovett&Co. Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this unique one bedroom ground floor apartment set on the private gated site of the Old Mill in the heart of the city centre.   The property is being offer with NO ONWARD CHAIN and features: open plan lounge /diner and kitchen with up...
"""Chestnut Green"" is a Most Appealing Four Bedroom Detached Residence standing in a substantial corner position within Woodthorne Road South, a much sought after Tettenhall location and only a short distance to all the excellent independent shops, cafes, restaurants and further amenities..."
"An outstanding, period property which is one of the oldest houses in the area and which provides beautiful, accommodation of much character standing in a large plot of just over a quarter of an acre in total."
A beautifully presented family home with particularly impressive ground floor accommodation in an outstanding plot of almost 0.4 of an acre in total with a particularly and impressive wide frontage to Woodthorne Road South with a large front lawn and dual entrance carriage driveway
Showell Lane is a detached family home which has been significantly improved upon during the current owner’s tenure and has a beautiful rear garden with stunning views across the South Staffordshire Countryside. The property benefits from central heating and double glazing. Mains gas and electric...
"Enderby Drive is an elegant family home with colonial style facade, generous driveway with large garage and gardens to the front and rear. The house is an exceptional family residence providing accommodation with well proportioned rooms to both the ground and first floors. (WOMBOURNE OFFICE..."
"* A generously proportioned and very stylish 4-bedroom detached house offering contemporary, spacious living close to the heart of Tettenhall village. Recently renovated throughout, with an excellent master en suite, a large, modern dining kitchen, and a substantial through lounge * Hall * Downs..."
A well appointed and well presented Tinacre Hill residence which has the potential for extensions (STPP).
"* An impressively spacious 4-bedroom detached house at the end of a Wightwick cul-de-sac, backing onto National Trust woodland. Presented to a very good standard throughout, with excellent gardens, and en suite master bedroom * Hall * Downstairs WC * Breakfast kitchen * Utility * Through lounge *..."
A stunning prestigious family home set back in a private location close to Bantock Park. The property comes with planning permission to extend it to an ultra modern five bedroom property. This property really must be seen. Enter the property into the welcoming hall that goes to the spacious loun...
"An exceptional two year old family home providing accommodation of the highest calibre in a delightful, corner plot with a matured setting and standing in a highly regarded address"
"* A capacious 4-bedroom detached house ideal for refurbishment, with potential to extend. Located in desirable Tettenhall within easy reach of the A41, backing onto a very large rear garden and having a sizeable garage * Porch * Hall * Downstairs WC * Dining room * Lounge with patio doors * Break..."
"An outstanding, recently refurbished and remodelled property providing contemporary accommodation of the highest calibre"
"FREEHOLD AND EPC RATED C. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND F. This is an impressively extended home of very generous proportions in Tettenhall. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, three large reception rooms, a conservatory, six bedrooms, and three bathrooms,. There are three bedr..."
"Four bedroom detached manor cottage situated on a deceptively spacious private plot secluded from Mount Road within the prime residential location of Penn offering no upward chain. Located within 2.5 miles of Wolverhampton city centre, this stunning home retreat is close to all sorts of ame..."
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations in Finchfield, convenient for the majority of amenities, in particular within easy walking distance of the popular attraction known as Bantock Park, this distinctive character property has been thoughtfully extended and restyled to create superb spa"
"An opportunity to purchase a truly unique 'dream' family home, thoughtfully designed to provide outstanding and spacious accommodation, that can only be appreciated by an interior viewing. This particularly impressive and distinctive family residence is located at the head of a cul-de-sac..."
A beautifully positioned single storey residence standing at the end of a gated drive leading off the prestigious Wrottesley Road
" * A stunning new 4-bedroom three-storey detached house just off Goldthorn Hill, offering exceptional, open plan contemporary accommodation. Finished to an excellent standard throughout, with three en suite bedrooms, a south-facing patio, and a vast, open-plan kitchen and living area * Superb ope..."
A landmark property standing in a prominent position in one of the City's most exclusive addresses
"* A well-presented, extended 4-bedroom detached house of an excellent size, with a large rear garden, generous internal proportions, and planning permission for further extension if required. Includes a double garage and master en suite * Hall * Downstairs WC * Sitting room * Lounge * Conservator..."
A beautifully restored period residence of grand proportions in a sought after residential area.
"* A very well-presented and stylish 3-bedroom detached bungalow within walking distance of Tettenhall centre. Benefits from master en suite, delightful front and rear gardens, garage, and a stunning kitchen diner * Hall * Dining room * Lounge with wood-burning stove * Large kitchen diner with bi-..."
"5 Springhill Park is a well positioned detached fine family home with generous living spaces and arranged over two floors. There is a large gravelled, gated driveway, double garage and gardens to the front side and rear. (WOMBOURNE OFFICE - EPC 'D')"
"Number 47 York Avenue is a fine example of a most attractive and imposing traditional detached property of distinction, having been extensively improved upon over the years to include the addition of a cleverly thought out attic conversion and a stylish collection of modern fittings, provides an ..."
"Occupying a pleasant position in a popular residential area, this characteristic end terraced property has been restyled over the years to provide deceptive & well planned living accommodation whilst enjoying a scenic setting at rear over woodland & South Staffordshire Railway Walk. "
*Stunning Family Home *Sought After Location *Close To Good Local Schools *Four Double Bedrooms *Extensively & Thoughtfully Extended *Generous Rear Garden *Double Garage & Utility *Conservatory *Three Reception Rooms *Master Bedroom With En Suite Bathroom *Guest WC *Viewing Is Highly Recommended
"* An ideally positioned and capacious 4-bedroom detached house close to the centre of Tettenhall, presented to a very good standard throughout. With a choice of excellent reception rooms, a master en suite, a double garage, and charming gardens * Hall * Downstairs WC * Generous lounge * Breakfast..."
"A superb opportunity to purchase a four bedroom, new build property close to the heart of Tettenhall Village in a small cul-de-sac of just 6 homes. ALL PHOTOS ARE EXAMPLES OF SIMILAR PROPERTIES"
"INCLUDES FLOORING & TURF TO REAR GARDEN - Up to £1,000 towards your mortgage for 12 months subject to t&c's - call Connells for information. Plot 4 ALDER HOUSE at VARDONS KEEP - A Well Designed, High Specification 4 Bedroom Detached Home. Set in private close, in the Popular Village of Tet..."
A superbly situated detached dormer bungalow with lovely views to the rear over open countryside. The property provides well proportioned and versatile living accommodation which is well apointed and tastefully presented throughout. In brief the accommodation comprises a Reception Hall with oak p...
"""A CHARMING UNIQUE & CHARACTERFUL PERIOD HOME - ADJOINING SPLIT LEVEL ANNEX STYLE ACCOMMODATION"" Comprising lounge, sitting room, entertainment family lounge diner, kitchen, utility/home office, four bedrooms, shower room, bathroom. Annex comprises lounge, wc & mezzanine Bedroom Five."
"Occupying a prime position in this highly sought after residential area, situated on a large site measuring at approx. 8,234sq feet, this distinctive detached house offers extremely spacious and versatile living accommodation being an excellent opportunity for purchasers requiring an expansive famil"
"* An enviably positioned 4-bedroom detached dormer bungalow in desirable Wightwick, backing onto open fields. With a large dining kitchen, two bathrooms, gated parking, and an excellent rear garden with wonderful rural views * Porch * Hall * Dining room * Lounge * Conservatory * Large kitchen din..."
"A Stunning Property in an Amazing Setting ; at the Top of its' own Lane Overlooking Tettenhall and Adjacent to the local Church of St Andrews and All Angels . Looking for something different, in a quiet picturesque surrounding with small caves, beautiful gardens and local walks all around. Ent..."
"5 The Heronry is undoubtedly an excellent model of its type, situated in an exclusive cul de sac just off Perton Brook Vale and therefore in one of the most favoured residential areas in Wolverhampton, this modern detached property has been extensively restyled to a very high specification!"
"Extended and modernised detached home offering a wealth of features for the modern family, located in a highly sought after location which is well served by local shops, schools and public transport. Occupying one of the largest plots on the development and with a generous garden to the rear, th..."
*** YOU MUST BE AN INVESTOR BUYER TO ENQUIRE ABOUT THIS PROPERTY - NOT AVAILABLE TO FIRST TIME BUYERS *** Landlord to Landlord Service - GetAnOffer are looking for LANDLORDS to purchase this home which is currently RENTED producing an income. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property fo...
A particularly well located and surprisingly spacious three bedroomed detached bungalow standing in a sought after position within walking distance of the village centre.
A well presented three bedroom detached property set in a large plot in a popular and sought after residential location.
"INCLUDES FLOORING & TURF TO REAR GARDEN - Up to £1,000 towards your mortgage for 12 months subject to t&c's - call Connells for information. Plot 2 BLACKTHORN HOUSE at VARDONS KEEP - A Beautiful, Spacious 3 Bedroom Detached Home. Set in private close, in the Popular Village of Tettenhall."
"A superb opportunity to purchase a three bedroom, new build property close to the heart of Tettenhall Village in a small cul-de-sac of just 6 homes. ALL PHOTOS ARE EXAMPLES OF SIMILAR PROPERTIES"
"Occupying a choice position on a small exclusive cul de sac just off Woodcote Road in a favoured residential area and within walking distance of Tettenhall Village Centre, this modern detached property is an excellent example of its type with internal inspection highly recommended. "
"A substantial family home standing in a surprisingly large plot in a small, spur position off a sought after road within easy walking distance of Tettenhall village centre with its full complement of local facilities and excellent schooling for which the area is renowned. Wolverhampton City Cent..."
"Occupying a choice position in one of the most favoured residential areas in Tettenhall and being convenient for the majority of amenities including schools, shops & local bus routes, this modern detached property has been restyled to provide a most charming and contemporary interior"
"HMO Rental Property For Sale, Tettenhall Road, Wolverhampton, WV3 14 Self-Contained Bedrooms"
"**A UNIQUE HEAVILY EXTENDED SIX-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN A POPULAR LOCATION OFF THE SPINNEY IN FINCHFIELD, WOLVERHAMPTON** A great opportunity to purchase an extended family home in Finchfield, Wolverhampton. Offering three versatile reception rooms with potential use as bedrooms or workspace, a..."
Distinctive individual Detached residence occupying lovely large plot of an exclusive cul-de-sac enjoying delightful position together with easy access into city centre and to wide range of local amenities. Particularly spacious accommodation of pleasant character creating a superb family home. T...
"***Investment opportunity*** Morgan Payne & Knightly are delighted to offer these four 1 - 2 bedroom flats in the highly sought after cul de sac, conservation area, of Park Dale West, off Tettenhall Road. Producing a yield of 6.72% at asking price. "
"Undoubtedly one of the finest examples of its type, this incredible three storey detached smart home offers an extensive and comprehensive range of modern living with executive appointments and fittings throughout. The spacious and luxuriously appointed living accommodation incorporates high end..."
"Steventon Land & Estate agents are pleased to be offering for sale, this substantial traditional detached property of generous proportions, having been extensively improved upon over the years, provides an excellent standard of superbly spacious and highly versatile living accommodation, which is..."
A well located family home providing extended accommodation in a sought after road.
"A most attractive & imposing traditional detached property, having been sympathetically improved upon over the years, provides a good standard of superbly spacious and highly versatile living accommodation, which is ideal as a larger family home."
"A deceptively spacious five bedroom family home in excess of 2,000 sq ft standing within a superb, southwest facing plot in a sought after address. The property benefits from a new roof and off road parking for up to four vehicles. NO UPWARD CHAIN"
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations of Tettenhall and occupying a choice position just off the Codsall Road, this modern detached property has been constructed in recent years to create a fine example of a spacious family home!"
An attractive family home providing delightful three bedroom accommodation that would benefit from a scheme of improvement and which has ample potential for works of extension (STPP).
"**ONLY ONE 5 BED REMAINING** An Exclusive Gated Development of Six Beautiful High Specification 4 and 5 Bedroom Detached New Build Homes Currently available to reserve off plan Estimated Build Finish Summer 2023 Prices from £440,000 to £495,000 Contact Connells Wolverhampton for fu..."
"* An enviably spacious and very well-presented 4-bedroom detached house on a prominent and impressively wide corner plot, within walking distance of local schooling. Features a vast driveway, a double garage, attractive gardens, a large breakfast kitchen, and four excellent double bedrooms * * Ha..."
"Occupying a choice cul de sac position located just off Goldthorn Hill and therefore in an established residential area, convenient for the majority of amenities including schools, shops and the city centre, this deceptive modern detached property has been extensively restyled & extended "
"""AN OUTSTANDING & RECENTLY REFURBISHED 5 BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, large extended kitchen/ lounge, dining room, ground floor wc, plant room/ storage area, 5 bedrooms, family bathroom & a shower room. Large driveway to front & enclosed rear garden."
A well located and deceptively spacious extended detached family residence offering fine accommodation over three storeys
A superbly situated and well presented family home with room of generous proportions throughout and with ample scope for extensions (STPP)
"Situated in an exclusive residential area and occupying a choice position in a most desirable cul de sac just off Perton Brook Vale, this modern detached property has been extensively restyled to a very high specification providing luxurious accommodation throughout and is a superb example of a fami"
"Occupying a choice cul de sac position located just off Goldthorn Hill and therefore in an established residential area, convenient for the majority of amenities including schools, shops & the city centre, this deceptive modern detached property has been extensively restyled & extended over the year"
" Rarer than hens teeth! This property is unlike anything else on the market - It could be two homes in one and offers so much more than you see from the front door. Parking for ten cars to the rear behind a double gated entrance with gardens to the front and side plus fitness room, entertainment..."
A superbly situated four bedroom family home with well proportioned and well presented accommodation throughout.
"""A STUNNING HOUSE WITH STUNNING VIEWS"" This beautiful 3 story character property comprises of, entrance hall, large lounge, large dining room, kitchen, utility, basement, 5 bedrooms, ensuite, family bathroom, driveway, large rear garden, double garage and fantastic views over Bantock Park."
"Situated in one of the most favoured locations on Goldthorn Park and set well back from the road by a walled & paved driveway, 4 Benson Avenue occupies a prominent position in the small select cul-de-sac just off Ward Road, this imposing & distinctive detached property has been extensively extended!"
"Situated in a small select cul de sac located just off Church Road and therefore in one of the most sought after locations in Tettenhall Wood, this most interesting split level detached house offers extremely spacious living accommodation with internal inspection highly recommended to appreciate the"
"An Exclusive Gated Development of Six Beautiful High Specification 4 and 5 Bedroom Detached New Build Homes Currently available to reserve off plan Estimated Build Finish Summer 2023 Prices from £440,000 to £495,000 Contact Connells Wolverhampton for further details"
"* A considerably improved and deceptively spacious 4-bedroom detached house in a sought-after residential area, a short walk from local schools. Boasts a stylish bathroom and master en suite, an excellent breakfast kitchen, and a well-presented garden * Porch * Hall * Breakfast kitchen * Large lo..."
"Situated in a popular residential area yet occupying a quite location convenient for the majority of amenities, this deceptive detached house has been extensively & professionally renovated to a most superior standard with a host of high quality fittings throughout creating a superb example of a mod"
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* An attractive detached bungalow having been extended and improved upon over the years, provides a good standard of superbly spacious and highly versatile living accommodation, which is equally ideal for the growing family or retiring persons."
We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom Semi Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
"A generously proportioned three bedroom semi-detached dormer bungalow that must be viewed to be fully appreciated, benefitting from double glazing, central heating, off road parking and a pleasant rear garden. Situated in a popular residential area close to a range of amenities, this pleasant ..."
"An imposing traditional detached property, having been extended to the ground floor rear elevation and improved upon over the years, provides a good standard of spacious and highly versatile living accommodation, which is ideal as a family home with excellent scope to extend over the garage, subj..."
"An extended spacious modern semi-detached property, an immaculately presented ""Smart Home"", having all the latest technology. The property boasts solar panels, underfloor heating on the ground floor and infrared radiators on both the first and second floor along with smart lighting system."
"Occupying a choice position in the exclusive & secluded private drive just off the Tettenhall Road A41 and therefore situated in a most popular residential area, this character detached property has been extensively extended and restyled over the years to create a luxury & contemporary interior "
"""AN OUTSTANDING DETACHED FOUR/FIVE BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY SITUATED IN THE POPULAR CASTLECROFT AREA"" Comprising porch, hall, lounge, sitting room, dining room, kitchen, gf shower room, study/Bed Five, four further bedrooms, en-suite, family bathroom, off road parking, front, side & rear gardens."
"Guide Price £425,000 - £450,000 Royston and Lund are proud to present this substantial three/four bedroom detached family home occupying an electric gated corner plot in Penn. The property benefits from a garage conversion that has created a home cinema room and is ideally situated for ..."
"Don't Miss Your Chance to View this Beautiful Five Bedroom Detached Home on the Popular SEDGEMOOR PARK ESTATE. Offering Excellent Parking, Local Amenities and Excellent Transport Links, This Property needs to be viewed to be appreciated. Call now on to view!!!"
"Royston and Lund are pleased to present this potential 11 bedroom multiple occupancy HMO property which is ideal for investors. The property is fully set up and is an excellent business opportunity. Situated on Wellington Road, Bilston this property is located near multiple local amenities and p..."
An attractive and well located single storey residence providing three bedroomed accommodation within easy walking distance of the village centre
"Old Chelsea is a period property occupying a lovely elevated position adjacent to the historic St Bartholomew’s Church and having off road parking to the fore, with two sets of steps leading up the decking area and frontage. (WOMBOURNE OFFICE - EPC: tbc)"
Fantastic Detached Property...Four Double Bedrooms...Massive Driveway For A Maximum Of Eight Cars...Finished To An Exceptionally High Standard...Stunning Rear Garden...Patio...Utility Room And Cloak Room...Three Reception Rooms...Popular Residential Local...Heavily Extended...Viewings Available Now!
"Elegant modern style Detached residence enjoying a particularly pleasant private setting on a corner plot with a wonderful outlook overlooking Manor Park and convenient accessibility to an excellent range of local amenities. Comfortably proportioned accommodation, attractively presented with impr..."
"""AN OUTSTANDINGLY LARGE AND SPACIOUS 5 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, dining room, 5 bedrooms, 2 en-suites, family bathroom, garage, off road parking to front and an enclosed rear garden."
"A surprisingly spacious, attractive and well located property providing extensive living space over three floors with four double bedrooms and in a sought after Tettenhall address"
" To the front of the properties is a shared driveway secluded from the main road with trees. Local amenities nearby including shops, restaurants, cafes and Smestow Valley Nature Park, Wightwick Manor, and Bantock Park are all within walking distance. There are good transport links and great sc..."
"A most imposing and attractive traditional 3/4 bedroom semi detached property, having been extensively extended and improved upon by the present owners, to include the addition of stylish modern fittings, provides an excellent standard of superbly spacious and exceptionally versatile living accom..."
"Set in the favoured residential area of Finchfield, this 4-bedroom family home unfolds over an excess of 2,000 sq ft, with traditional proportions and versatile living spaces to ensure it is perfectly suited to modern family living"
"Take a period family home, lovingly renovate to the highest standards, and throw in lovely views of surrounding parkland, and you have Finchfield Road"
"*Well Presented, Spacious Detached Home *Sought After Location *Three Double Bedrooms *Lounge And Dining Room *Master Bedroom With En Suite And Dressing Room *Modern Family Bathroom *Fitted Kitchen * Utility Room
*Guest WC *Garage *Drive And Rear Garden *Chain Free *Viewing Is Highly Recommended"
"Innovate Estate Agents are delighted to present this FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME situated in Bilston! The property boasts of DRIVEWAY to side providing OFF ROAD PARKING, entrance hallway, LOUNGE, FITTED KITCHEN/DINER, guest W/C, EN SUITE'S to two bedrooms, first floor Jack and Jill show..."
"A most impressive four bedroom detached property that reaches new heights in its specification and unique features to include: - Bath with waterproof TV, partial underfloor heating to ground floor, fantastic garden room/entertaining room, adjoining 'work from home' office/annexe space to mention..."
"Four bedroom semi detached family home that is modern, well presented and ready to move into with a huge amount of dynamic living accommodation on offer. Situated in a large plot on a highly regarded road with excellent commuting links."
"NO CHAIN - Exclusive detached home finished to a high standard situated in a popular location close to local shops, schools and canalside walks. The property is set back from the main road and comprises entrance hall, living room, dining kitchen, utility room, ground floor w.c, three double bedro..."
* Beautiful two bedroom period home of considerable character * Enviable central village position * Hall * Downstairs cloaks * Breakfast kitchen * Stunning period lounge * Master bedroom * Second double bedroom * Single bedroom * Store-room or walk-in wardrobe * Bathroom * Garage * Beautiful rear...
"Immaculately presented four bedroom detached family home, set within a popular residential neighbourhood and with excellent transport links to the Black Country. Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the condition and proportions of the accommodation. Call now on to Vie..."
"**ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR MAISONETTE OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** First floor maisonette situated in popular residential location with easy access to Wolverhampton City Centre, schools of all grades, local amenities and public transport. The property briefly comprises: Separate entrance door..."
An elegant detached family home which stands in a superb location within easy reach of the City Centre and within walking distance of a wide range of excellent schools. Richmond Road is a highly regarded address which has always proved attractive within the housing market and which sta...
"""A DETACHED FAMILY HOME SITUATED ON A GENEROUS PLOT WITH AWAITED PLANNING PERMISSION FOR A DETACHED BUNGALOW TO REAR SIDE"" Comprising guest wc, sitting room, 21ft lounge diner, dining area, kitchen, 3 bedrooms & a bathroom. Driveway to front, drive in spacious garden, large detached garage"
"* A large 5-bedroom semi-detached period home of considerable character and excellent proportions. With two reception spaces, five double bedrooms, a garage, and proximity to a choice of local primary schools * Hall * Lounge * Dining room * Breakfast kitchen * Utility * Ground-floor shower room *..."
A substantial four double bedroom property in a highly sought after location
A superbly presented three bedroom semi-detached property in a particularly sought after residential area
Occupying a choice cul de sac position in a most sought after location in Penn this detached house has been extensively extended and refurbished by the present owners to create stunning living accommodation and is an exceptional example of a family house. 
"Occupying a pleasant corner position in a popular location convenient for the majority of amenities, this deceptive & extensively extended semi-detached property has been restyled by the present owners to create a superb example of a spacious family house providing tremendously spacious acc"
"* A deceptively spacious 3-bedroom link-detached house on a select cul-de-sac, featuring two reception spaces plus a large utility, conservatory, and breakfast kitchen. The property includes a master en suite, an attractive family bathroom, and off-road parking * Porch * Lounge * Dining room * Co..."
"The Clermont home ticks all the boxes. Light, spacious and contemporary is what this home stands for. Offering you a desirable kitchen island, perfect for entertaining, with an open plan layout including important needs of integrated appliances this home really does have it all."
"An extremely well presented detached property occupying a delightful and quiet position in a popular residential area local to a range of amenities. This impressive four bedroom family home offers spacious accommodation, tastefully decorated throughout and must be seen to be appreciated. The pro..."
"* A fully refurbished and immaculately presented 3-bedroom detached house on a desirable cul-de-sac, within easy reach of a choice of amenities and schools. Boasts new bathrooms and kitchen with appliances, underfloor heating downstairs, garaging, and an en suite master bedroom * Hall * Downstair..."
"A CONTEMPORARY FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME LOCATED IN A POPULAR AND ESTABLISHED RESIDENTIAL AREA *NO UPWARD CHAIN* The generous and well laid out accommodation is well suited to modern family occupation and briefly comprises entrance hall, living room, dining room, modern kitchen, ..."
A conveniently situated four bedroom detached family home standing in a sought after area
"Beautifully appointment Brand New detached family home situated in a popular and convenient location with pleasant walks nearby. Finished to a high specification. Three double bedrooms, Modern Ensuite & bathroom, living room, open plan kitchen/ dining/ family room, guest Wc, ample off road..."
"A spacious and well appointed detached bungalow standing in an extremely pleasant situation at the head of a small, private spur drive leading off Hyperion Drive which is a cul-de-sac of quality properties (WOMBOURNE OFFICE)"
A beautifully presented and extended three bedroom semi-detached property in one of the most sought after roads in the area.
An elegant late 19th Century villa with deceptively spacious accommodation which stands in an elevated position in a sought after location with the added benefit of a driveway and garage to the side
Spacious four bedroom detached home occupying a choice position at the head of a popular cul-de-sac close to Church Hill. Offering tremendous potential with the possibility of further extension (subject to relevant building and planning consents) the property is available with no onward chain and...
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* A traditional detached dormer bungalow, having been substantially enlarged and improved upon over the years, provides a good standard of spacious and versatile living accommodation, which is ideal for a growing family or retiring persons."
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Considerably enlarged 3 Bedroom Detached Bungalow of deceptively spacious proportions, pleasantly positioned in a quiet cul-de-sac position off Sandringham Road within popular locality. Generous accommodation is superbly appointed and would be equally suited to comfortable fam..."
"* A very attractive and spacious 4-bedroom link-detached house on a delightful Compton cul-de-sac, with a wonderful contemporary breakfast kitchen, master bedroom with en suite, and a useful home office/second living space/fourth bedroom with patio doors * Porch * Sizeable, contemporary breakfast..."
Fantastic Semi Detached property...Approved Plans For A Three Bed House...Five Massive Bedrooms...Downstairs W.C/Wet Room...Plenty Of Storage...Vast Property...Superb Kitchen Diner...Useful Pantry...Off Road Parking Via The Rear...Converted Loft...Large Outhouses...Viewings Available Immediately!!!
"Tucked away at the end of a quiet leafy close, is this deceptively spacious and extended four double bedroom, two reception room detached house. Beautifully presented and decorated, the property briefly comprises of; reception hall with access to the ground floor cloakroom, under stairs storage ..."
""" RARE AND UNIQUE SUBSTANTIAL DETACHED FAMILY HOME OFFERING COUNTRYSIDE VIEWS TO FRONT"" Comprising of pleasant front and rear gardens with off road parking and a 20ft garage to side. Internally there is a lounge, dining room, office/ study, breakfast kitchen, guest wc, 3 bedrooms, bathroom."
"Needs to be Viewed to appreciate the spacious layout of this beautiful three bedroom Maisonette in an extremely popular location. Offering Close Local Amenities, local bus routes to high street aswell as excellent transport links. Perfect property for First Time Buyers and Investors."
"To the front of the property you have the driveway with frontage and a secured private side gate to access the rear garden which leads you through to the garage.  Inside you benefit from a spacious front room with a traditional fully functional fireplace and a bright bay window, a separat..."
"** Wow! ** ** Massively Extended Semi! ** ** Overlooking West Park! **Belvoir are pleased to present this wonderful FIVE BEDROOM semi detached house to the market. This huge house is perfect for a large family or potential for HMO conversion (STPP), only being a 15 minute walk (through ..."
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations in Wolverhampton located just off the Penn Road and adjacent to the Stourbridge Road, this deceptive semi-detached property is convenient for easy access to the majority of amenities. An excellent example of a family house!i"
"""A TRADITIONAL CORNER PLOT DETACHED FAMILY HOME WITH REAR GATED CAR PARKING"" Comprising of front, side and rear gardens with dual gate entrance to front and side access, garage to side, lounge, dining room, sitting room, kitchen, conservatory, 3 bedrooms & fitted bathroom."
"""A 5 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED EXTENDED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, media room, kitchen diner, utility, bedroom with en-suite, down stairs wc, 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom, to the top floor there is a master bedroom with en-suite. Crete print driveway & a rear garden"
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE EXTENDED TRADITIONAL DETACHED HOME"" Externally the property has large off road parking to front & secure parking to side, detached garage, large rear garden & outbuilding. Internally there is a dining room, lounge, kitchen, 3 bedrooms, large converted attic area & bathroom."
"Situated in a popular residential area with the majority of services close at hand, this deceptive detached house has been extended and well maintained over the years to create a charming family home, ideal for purchasers requiring a property to restyle to own requirements including huge ability to "
"Beautifully presented four-bedroom detached family home idyllically situated at the end of a private road in hugely sought after residential location of Penn. This generously sized property is positioned close to local amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, unive..."
"* A beautifully presented and very spacious 3-bedroom apartment on the top floor of a modern, luxury apartment building. Superb open-plan kitchen, lounge, and dining area with balcony off, plus a utility, en suite master bedroom, and secure gated parking * Hall * Open-plan lounge, dining area and..."
"* An unmissable 2-3 bedroom, first-floor apartment within a glorious Georgian house conversion, set in desirable Wightwick. Offers 2293 sq. ft. of elegant period living with two en suite bedrooms, a 27ft lounge, conservatory, and balcony * Hall * Excellent breakfast kitchen * Utility * Conservato..."
"Occupying a prime position set well back from the road, 127a Coalway Road is situated in one of the most favoured residential areas of Wolverhampton having many useful facilities close to hand, this individually designed detached house has been restyled over the years "
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A WELL PRESENTED SPACIOUS FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, ground floor WC, conservatory, four bedrooms, en suite to master bedroom, family bathroom, front and rear gardens, off road parking & ga..."
*** NEW DETACHED FAMILY HOME *** FOUR BEDROOMS *** 2 EN-SUITES *** DOWNSTAIRS WC *** SPACIOUS LOUNGE *** MASSIVE KITCHEN/DINER *** 2 RECEPTION ROOMS *** MUST BE SEEN TO BE FULLY APPRECIATED *** Introducing the perfect family home! This stunning 4 bedroom abode boasts a modern design ...
"* A valuable development opportunity in beautiful Wightwick – building plot of approximately 0.3 acres with planning permission for a stunning new 4-bedroom, split-level detached house and double garage, just off a quiet cul-de-sac * Ref: 21/00252/OUT * Detailed planning has been granted *..."
"* The Cheese House * A characterful and spacious 3-bedroom detached period house over 3 storeys on Tettenhall’s Wrottesley Road, a short walk from the bustling centre of the village. With a wonderful breakfast kitchen, off-road parking, and a covered courtyard garden * Hall * Dining room * ..."
"Occupying a choice position in one of the most sought after locations on Goldthorn Park, this impressive and deceptive semi-detached property has been extended to create a most generous specification providing excellent accommodation as a family house."
"A deceptively spacious, detached bungalow standing in a convenient position within walking distance of local facilities and standing in a highly regarded road in a large plot with a wide frontage to Springhill Lane and a large and private garden to both the side and rear with a large plot size of..."
SUPER SONIC SOLAR POWER TO THE RESCUE....HOLY MOLY MACARONI
"A well presented and extended four bedroomed detached property, occupying a quiet position with ample driveway parking and a good sized rear garden. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, schools and local amenities. Accom..."
An immaculate and well presented three / four bedroomed detached property. Occupying a quiet position with private resin driveway and a landscaped rear garden with seating area and garage to the side elevation. The property has been extended to provide a spacious open plan living area which i...
"Extended modern detached bungalow on a private shared driveway in the sought-after location of Finchfield, located close to local amenities including shops and bus routes and having Smestow Valley Railway Walk and Canal access on the doorstep. This well-presented renovated property has been finis..."
"A recently refurbished detached family home standing in a sought after location with a large, southwest facing rear garden. This is the first time that the property has been offered for sale in ninety years."
"Spacious, gas centrally heated, majority uPVC double-glazed 3/4 bedroom detached for modernisation upon fine corner plot offering considerable potential briefly comprising; Reception Hall, Lounge (with bay), Dining room, ""Home-Office""(alternative fourth Bedroom), Fitted Cloaks, Kitchen...."
This is a most impressive Modern Three bedroom Detached property which occupies a slightly elevated position in a much sought after residential location and handily placed for local amenities and a range of comprehensive amenities in Tettenhall and Compton village centres.
This is a most impressive Three bedroom traditional Semi Detached property having been extended and extensively improved upon to provide an excellent standard of spacious and well proportioned living accommodation which is ideal as a family home.
"An attractive and rather deceptive Victorian semi detached property of generous proportions, having been substantially improved upon over the years, to include the addition of stylish modern fittings, providing an excellent standard of superbly spacious and versatile living accommodation, which i..."
"Substantial traditional style Three/Four Bedroom Detached family residence occupying an established residential position of popularity on the south western suburbs of Wolverhampton, handy for access to the city centre and a host of local amenities. The property occupies an extensive plot enjoying..."
This substantially extended and much improved four bedroom semi detached home with garage and parking is immaculately presented throughout and enjoys an enviable setting in one of the areas most sought after residential locations close to highly regarded schools and local amenities. A very desira...
"*Well Presented Spacious Dormer Bungalow *Sought After, Quiet Location In Tettenhall, Wolverhampton
*Three/Four Bedrooms *Modern Fitted Kitchen/Diner *Block Paved Drive And Separate Garage *Generous Master Bedroom *Corner Plot *Rear Garden *Viewing Is Highly Recommended"
"OUTSTANDING EXTENDED DETACHED! This impressive family home benefits from a two storey rear extension, FOUR BEDROOMS, TWO EN SUITE SHOWER ROOMS as well being comprehensively refurbished throughout from front to back. As well as comprising of gas central heating & uPVC double glazing this spa..."
"* An attractive 3-bedroom link-detached house of comfortable proportions on a peaceful Compton cul-de-sac. With a lovely rear garden, a garage, breakfast kitchen, and an excellent open-plan living space * Porch * Downstairs WC * Breakfast kitchen * Utility * Large L-shaped open-plan lounge and di..."
This detached house has been thoughtfully extended and internal inspection is essential in order to fully appreciate the ideal family accommodation. It is situated behind a neat frontage in a popular tree lined road within a sought after residential neighbourhood and is ideally located for all...
"Wakeley Hill is a detached family home which has been extended by the current owners and now offers well proportioned living spaces with off road parking for several vehicles and a lovely landscaped garden with an open aspect to the rear. The internal accommodation briefly comprises lounge, kitch..."
"LARGE DETACHED HOME. FREEHOLD AND EPC RATED E. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND D. , This property has been comprehensively refurbished and extended to provide a large family home in the desirable location of Compton, close to some of Wolverhampton's best schools. The flexible accommodatio..."
"Presenting to the market a fantastic THREE BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY located on the very recent urban village development offering great access to transport links, amenities and schools. The property has been finished to a high specification with large living spaces and a kitchen dining..."
"A fantastic and unusually spacious two bedroom apartment, offering superb contemporary living accommodation located within close proximity to sought-after Tettenhall village."
"Get your ""Graft on"" and make sure you visit this immaculately presented and fully renovated detached family residence. It offers the most exceptional living accommodation throughout. Restyled and redesigned to a standard you will be blown away with and located within th..."
"* An enviable 2 bedroom first floor apartment individually designed to a high specification having only had one owner * Immediately off Tettenhall’s leafy Lower Green * Walking distance to local amenities and bus links * Private development * Hall * Open plan kitchen, dining and living area..."
No summary available.
** Delectable Detached! ** ** Sought After Estate! ** ** No Chain! **Belvoir are pleased to present this wonderful four bedroom detached home to the market. This stunning home has been impeccably maintained and is located in a quiet cul-de-sac tucked into the corner. 
**DETACHED THREE-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION WITH DETACHED GARAGE TO THE REAR** Positioned in a sought-after location with amenities close by including schools and shops and great access links to jobs at the i54 and motorway links to Telford and Birmingham. The property offers a la...
"An impressive and substantial detached four bedroom, two reception room and two bathroom family home. This well presented residence offers family size accommodation, benefitting from central heating, majority double glazing, off road parking for numerous vehicles and a detached double garage...."
"IMPRESSIVE FAMILY HOME IN FORDHOUSES. FREEHOLD AND EPC RATED E. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND D. This is a significantly extended home which, while well-maintained, would benefit from some cosmetic updating. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, W.C, lounge, kitchen dining room, ..."
"A recently renovated and restyled dormer bungalow providing immaculate, contemporary accommodation over two floors in a popular location"
A well-positioned three-bedroom bungalow within the sought-after residence of Tettenhall.
"""AN OUTSTANDINGLY WELL PRESENTED GRAND THREE BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY WITH LARGE GARAGE TO SIDE"" Comprising hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs wc, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom, 50ft garage, front & large rear garden, side access (with extension possibilities ST..."
"FREEHOLD FAMILY HOME. EPC RATED E. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a beautifully presented family home, offering a delightful blend of period character and modern fittings. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, cloakroom/ WC, two reception rooms, conservatory, modern kit..."
A stunning period residence set over 3 floors effortlessly combines original features and modern fittings is located most conveniently towards the City centre and A41 respectively. This Victorian semi-detached villa enjoys spacious family accommodation which has been subtlety decorated and dresse...
"""A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED AND HIGHLY DECEPTIVE AND EXTENDED DETACHED BUNGALOW ON OFFER"" Comprising of large front and rear gardens, 31ft garage to side, internally there is a lounge, fantastic refitted entertainment breakfast kitchen, utility, 2/3 bedrooms, dining room, separate lounge, bathroom."
"*Well Presented Modern Detached Home *Close To Good Local School, 'The Royal School' *Four Bedrooms With Fitted Wardrobes *Generous Rear Garden *Master Bedroom With En Suite *Modern Family Bathroom *Guest WC *Two Reception Rooms *Fitted Kitchen *Utility Room *Garage And Drive *Chain Free"
"Situated in one of the most established residential areas in Wolverhampton, this deceptive semi-detached property has been extended over the years to provide a most spacious and versatile interior, presenting an excellent example of a well-appointed family house."
"A superb family house occupying a pleasant cul de sac position in a popular residential area convenient for the majority of amenities including Bantock Park, this deceptive semi-detached property has been thoughtfully extended and restyled to create an excellent family home!"
"Occupying a choice position on a popular modern development convenient for the majority of amenities and within easy walking distance of Compton Village & the amenities therein, this delightful property is a superb example of a family home. "
"5 BEDROOMS AND 4 BATHROOMS An imposing detached five bedroom family home located within close proximity to good local amenities and Ofsted rated good schools for children of all ages. The property boasts; two reception rooms, 2 shower rooms, garage and potential to erect an additional property STPP"
"Perfectly located on one of the desirable streets in Bradmore/Merry Hill, Wolverhampton with amenities nearby such as schools, supermarkets, eateries and excellent transporting links this delightful detached property offers character and charm in abundance along with a well appointed level of acc..."
An immaculately presented three bedroom semi-detached property in a highly sought after location. Offered for sale with No Chain
"* A very attractive and luxurious 2-bedroom ground-floor retirement apartment in a superb, modern McCarthy & Stone community. With master en suite and walk-in wardrobe, a well-appointed kitchen, and a door from the living area directly to the excellent grounds * Hall * Large living and dining spa..."
"A charming mid-terrace Victorian residence providing extended four bedroom and three reception room accommodation with a long, west facing rear garden in a sought after address."
"FREEHOLD AND EPC RATED D. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a beautifully-presented family home in the popular location of Penn. The accommodation comprises an entrance porch and hall, guest WC, large extended living room, with separate dining, lounge, and snug areas, large breakf..."
" Occupying a large plot within this prestigious Lower Penn address enjoying a semi rural location yet ideally placed to both Wolverhampton city centre and Wombourne village, this substantially extended and significantly improved semi detached family home offers three double bedrooms, house bathr..."
"An extended family home in a corner position set back from the road. Enter the property into a large porch area that is open plan to the hall, utility and downstairs shower room. Also off the hall is the large spacious lounge and the kitchen/diner/family area with patio doors out into the pati..."
"Large 4 bedroom detached family house in the popular location of Penn. The property comprises- Double entrance driveway providing ample parking, entrance porch, hallway, lounge/diner, modern kitchen, dining room, modern downstairs shower room and WC, 4 double bedrooms, family bathroom, good si..."
"This very well-presented TWO bedroom detached bungalow is an exception of its type and can be found close to the outskirts of Penn, a popular residential quarter of the city favoured for its extensive local amenities, schools, and proximity to commuter links. Noted for its most except..."
"""A 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising of lounge, kitchen diner, downstairs wc and utility room. Upstairs there are 3 good sized bedrooms and a generous family bathroom. Externally to the front there is a driveway leading to the garage and enclosed rear garden."
Traditional-style Detached House favourably positioned in consistently popular residential neighbourhood. Modernised specification with under floor heating to the living room and kitchen/diner. Porch and Hall. Large living room. Kitchen/Diner with adjacent Utility Area. Three Bedrooms. Bathroom ...
"* A wonderful investment opportunity in a sought-after residential part of Wolverhampton, currently presented as a 2-bedroom end-terrace on a large development plot. Potential to construct a new 3-bedroom dwelling and extend the existing house, subject to planning applications * Hall * Lounge * D..."
"This Four Bedroom Detached Property is located on Park Hall Road in Goldthorn and is within very close proximity to amenities nearby such as schools, supermarkets, eateries and has excellent transporting links heading into and out of Wolverhampton. To the ground floor the property features two re..."
"An absolute delight to bring to market is this extended and well-proportioned traditional semi-detached house offering three bedroomed accommodation, staircase to fully boarded loft space with Velux windows and spacious extended living to ground floor with the benefits of three reception rooms an..."
"Situated within one of the most favourable areas of Tettenhall this most desirable dormer style detached property is placed on a generous plot most conveniently to the A41 and the vibrant Tettenhall Green and Tettenhall Wood respectively with both hosting a variety of independent shops, boutique..."
"Conveniently placed to Wolverhampton City Centre, this three bedroom semi-detached house offers a great family/first time purchase opportunity and is well placed to Wolverhampton City Centre. Situated in a popular central residential location within a pleasant tree lined Cul De Sac, c..."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* This Four Bedroom Detached property is located on a quiet cul-de-sac on Elwells Close in Sedgemoor Park and benefits from being very close to amenities such as schools, supermarkets, eateries and excellent transporting links heading into and out of Wolverhampton. The property f..."
"**FIVE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME WITH TWO ENSUITES - VIEWINGS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED** Off road parking, large lounge and conservatory, fitted kitchen/diner, downstairs w.c. four upstairs bedroom with ensuite to master and family bathroom. Double glazing and central heating."
"Innovate Estate Agents are pleased to present this FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY situated in Bilston! The property boasts of OFF ROAD PARKING, REAR GARAGE, front entrance porch, TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, FITTED KITCHEN, CONSERVATORY, utility room, downstairs shower room, family bathroom, rear garden,..."
"No upward chain is offered for this spacious, extended family home with generous gardens located in the sought after Goldthorn Hill. The generous and flexible accommodation benefits from a large extension to the rear, internally the home provides, entrance hallway, lounge extended fami..."
A particularly well situated bungalow with well proportioned two bedroom accommodation and lovely gardens in a sought after Finchfield address.
"Situated within walking distance of Tettenhall Village and the amenities therein, this splendid ground floor apartment has been constructed to a well-planned design utilising the maximum space. Built in 2018 by McCarthy & Stone, Thorneycroft is an first class example of a luxury retirement developm"
A well located link-detached three bedroom family home standing in a sought after cul-de-sac in Finchfield.
A spacious two-bedroom first floor apartment providing well-appointed accommodation within the sought-after area of Tettenhall.
"**BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW RECENTLY MODERNISED THROUGHOUT TO A HIGH STANDARD** Impressive split-level bungalow boasting stunning rear views, newly fitted kitchen/diner area and large lounge area. Two double bedrooms and third bedroom/office space and conservatory. ..."
"""A STUNNING THREE/FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY WITH A DETACHED GARAGE TO REAR"" Comprising entrance hall, downstairs shower room, dining room, kitchen, large open plan lounge, three/four bedrooms (Bedroom Four/study), family bathroom, double detached garage, large wrap around driv..."
"Large extended semi-detached home in a much sought after location convenient for local schools, shops, playing fields and public transport. The property features an impressive open plan sitting/dining room, extended living room, kitchen, utility, study, guest w.c, three generous bedrooms and mode..."
"Council Tax band C FREEHOLD We are delighted to present to the market this brand new four-bedroom, end of terrace town house situated on Broadleaf Gardens, Wolverhampton. The property offers a well-adapted layout, spacious and comfortable accommodation making it the pe..."
" ***OUR OPENING TIMES ARE 9AM-9PM, 7 DAYS A WEEK!*** This spacious two bedroom bungalow is located in Finchfield which is a very desirable part of Wolverhampton and is within catchment to some very good schools and local amenities nearby. The property briefly comprises of; a hallway, a lo..."
"An extended semi-detached property complimented by a 'WREN' kitchen with both internal and external bi-foldable doors plus a downstairs shower room is very well presented and offers modern and spacious living accommodation which also includes an entrance hall, lounge, utility cupboard, three bedr..."
"Large semi-detached home in a highly sought after location, convenient for Penn Common and the highly regarded St. Bartholomew's Primary School. Extended and with a generous garden to the rear the property includes separate living and sitting rooms, dining kitchen, ground floor w.c, three good si..."
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations in Tettenhall and occupying a choice position, this distinctive & unique semi-detached property has been thoughtfully restyled to create superb living accommodation ideal as a spacious family house. "
"Beautifully presented two/three bedroom detached bungalow situated on a large corner plot in a hugely popular area in Penn. Located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public transport avai..."
"Occupying a prominent corner position on the corner of Links Road and Wakeley Hill, in one of the most favoured locations in Penn, this distinctive and attractive semi-detached house has been sympathetically maintained over the years to provide an excellent example of a spacious family home. "
Braden Road is an extended semi-detached family home which has been considerably enhanced by the current owners during their tenure with off road parking to the front and a large rear garden. (WOMBOURNE OFFICE)
*NO UPWARD CHAIN* This is an impressive Modern Three Double bedroom Detached property which occupies a most pleasant position in a sought after cul de sac location and is handily placed for a range of general amenities in the area and excellent schools near by.
An Immaculate Spacious Family Home in a Quiet Corner Position. Enter the property into the welcoming porch that leads into the hall. Doors lead to the spacious lounge with a light and bright feel; open plan into the dining room. A well equipped galley kitchen that is 'L' shaped and goes towards ...
"Three bedroom semi-detached period family home refurbished to a high standard throughout situated in residential location offering no upward chain. Located within 1 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges a..."
"OVERLOOKING PARK - GARAGE AND DRIVE WAY - FOUR BEDROOMS - ENSUITE - OPEN KITCHEN/DINER - An immaculate four bedroom detached family home overlooking an open parkland, situated on a popular modern development in the Oxley area. The property comprises entrance hall, lounge, kitchen diner, utility r..."
"A luxury TWO BEDROOM retirement apartment. Situated on the SECOND FLOOR in our prestigious THORNEYCROFT development. Further benefits include Shower room, Guest WC's, Walk out balcony with garden views. Imposing hallway. MUST BE VIEWED"
 **AN EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE** **NO CHAIN** **LOUNGE WITH DOUBLE DOORS OPENING INTO EXTENDED DINING ROOM** **EXTENDED KITCHEN** **DOWNSTAIRS W.C.** **FRONT AND REAR GARDENS** **GARAGE & DRIVEWAY** 
"FREEHOLD. EPC RATED D. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a very well-presented home which has been much improved. The accommodation comprises an entrance hallway, a fitted kitchen, two generous reception rooms, an inner hall, a ground-floor shower / WC, an office / fourth bedroom,..."
" Soul Estates are proud to present this well presented extended 3 / 4 bedroom semi-detached house For Sale. This perfect family home is situated in a very popular area of Wolverhampton in Upper Penn, with excellent local schools and local amenities near by. The property is located near Penn Hos..."
A recently refurbished property which is one of the very few properties in the development that benefits from both a driveway and a garage that adjoin the property. Highgrove is a highly regarded retirement scheme and is considered to be one of the finest of its type in the area.
"An extended, well maintained Two Bedroom Detached Bungalow situated in a very pleasant cul-de-sac within a quiet and well-regarded area. A range of excellent local amenities are nearby including Bantock Park, schools and a number of shops. One of the bedrooms has been extended to provide enh..."
"Beautifully presented four/five bedroom detached family home idyllically situated in a hugely popular residential area of Bilston. This generously sized property is located close to local amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities..."
"""A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE AN ELEGANT & IMPRESSIVE TRADITIONAL SEMI-DETACHED HOME"" Comprising of beautiful front & rear gardens, lounge, sitting room, cloak room, dining room, kitchen, utility, guest wc, cellar, FOUR BEDROOMS, two bathroom areas. VIEWING IS HIGHLY RECOMMENDED"
"A delightfully presented three-bedroom semi-detached house conveniently situated on the south western suburbs of Wolverhampton convenient for local shopping facilities and public transport and with easy access to the city centre. Offering roomy accommodation finished to an excellent standard, the..."
"* A wonderful 2-bedroom, second-floor luxury retirement apartment in Tettenhall’s prestigious Clock Gardens, close to Upper Green. Features an en suite master bedroom and dressing area, a 25ft living space with dual-aspect Juliet balconies, superb communal gardens, and excellent on-site fac..."
A well located and well maintained detached family home standing in a sought after cul-de-sac setting
"An impressive family home which has been well maintained by current owners, occupying a generous plot upon the highly desirable Ettingshall Park estate of Wolverhampton. Being EXTENDED to rear ground floor, this good-sized traditional semi detached property also comprises; gas central heating, do..."
A substantial detached property occupying a pleasant position in an extremely popular residential area local to a range of amenities. This spacious family home with three double bedrooms is offered for sale with no upward chain and must be seen to be appreciated. This impressive residence bene...
NO UPWARD CHAIN Occupying a prime position down a private lane and forming part of a small cluster of 3 independent bungalows this detached property is located off Clark road which is ideal for access to the city centre or alternatively the A41 and beyond. The spacious accommodation enjoys an en...
"""A SIGNIFICANTLY IMPROVED & EXTENDED 4/5 BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising hall, reception room, lounge, kitchen, bedroom 5, downstairs shower room, 4 first floor bedrooms, en-suite & a family bathroom, brick built storage shed, off road parking, enclosed rear garden"
"""A SIGNIFICANTLY IMPROVED CHAIN FREE FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PERIOD PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, large lounge, dining room, extended kitchen, four bedrooms (set over two floors), family bathroom, off road parking, garden to side & enclosed rear garden."
"An Immaculate Family Home Totally Renovated & Decorated Inside. Enter the detached property into the spacious hall that leads into the light and bright open plan living area of large lounge with multi fuel stove and oak beam, dining area and stunning new kitchen; a door leads into the garden a..."
"An attractive, detached residence standing in an excellent corner plot in a popular and sought after residential location. NO UPWARD CHAIN 28 DAY EXCHANGE REQUIRED"
"Situated in a popular residential area on the corner of Aldersley Road & Lynton Avenue and within walking distance of local Schools & Shops, this spacious detached house has been built to a well-planned design utilising the maximum space and is an excellent example of a good size family house. Taste"
"Welcomed by the Ample Red Crete imprint driveway this 4 bedroom semi-detached house is not to be missed. Based in Wolverhampton.  The ground floor benefits from a separate dining room, Fitted Kitchen, Utility room, guest W.C, Garden, Driveway and Garage. The first floor offers A family ba..."
"Set well back from the road just off Stockwell Road and therefore located in one of the most sought after locations in Tettenhall, within walking distance of Tettenhall Village & the amenities therein, this beautifully presented apartment is positioned on the first floor of this distinctive & modern"
"NO CHAIN - Extended four bedroom semi-detached home in a highly sought after location with generous living accommodation throughout. Whilst requiring some cosmetic updating, the property offers tremendous living accommodation, including an inviting reception hall, sitting room, living room, snug..."
"IMMACULATE, MODERN AND STYLISHLY PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM, TWO BATHROOM DETACHED PROPERTY. This extremely well presented family home is located on an extremely popular modern development and has been maintained throughout to a particularly high standard. The accommodation to this residence br..."
""" A LARGE FIVE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, entertainment kitchen, five bedrooms and family bathroom. Off road parking to front and a large enclosed rear garden."
A well-appointed three bedroom family residence providing extended accommodation to the ground floor.
"Occupying a choice and elevated position this link detached property is situated in-between the amenities of both Tettenhall Green and Compton where both offer a variety of local shops, independent boutiques, cafes, and bus routes towards and away from the City centre. Located within the catchme..."
A spacious three bedroom family home within a sought after location
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations in Compton and occupying an elevated position with a great view to the front aspect overlooking the horizon, this lovely three bedroom link detached property has been well cared for over the years by its current vendors to create superb living ac..."
"* A comfortably proportioned and well-presented 3-bedroom semi-detached house in desirable Finchfield, within walking distance of considerable local schooling and amenities. Includes extensive gated parking, garage, and planning permission to extend * Porch * Hall * Lounge * Living and dining roo..."
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Traditional-style Detached with pleasant wooded outlook in a much-favoured neighbourhood on the outskirts of Wolverhampton city, located close to Tettenhall Village and within walking distance of local shops and bus stops. Well-proportioned accommodation with further upgrading..."
"** Superb Extended Semi! ** ** Immaculate Condition Throughout! ** Belvoir are delighted to present this magnificent semi-detached home to the market, no expense has been spared with the quality and finish of this wonderful home, perfectly blending contemporary design with timeless..."
" * PART EXCHANGE CONSIDERED * A superb 2-bedroom, first-floor luxury apartment in a magnificent McCarthy & Stone Retirement Plus complex (This apartment was one of the first to be purchased), with Juliet balcony, considerable on-site facilities, secure parking, and beautiful grounds. Just a short..."
"Occupying a pleasant cul-de-sac position on this popular modern development, set well back from the road and overlooking open greenery at front, this charming detached house is a superb example of a well appointed family home with a number of features throughout."
"A very well presented three bedroom detached property, standing within a convenient location."
"This highly presented modern detached property is conveniently located for the I54 business park and offers easy access to the M54, M6 and further road networks beyond. Pendeford itself has a large supermarket along with a range of smaller shops, library, health centre, community centre and a var..."
"* A very spacious, well-presented 3-bedroom detached house in a very enviable position, close to Tettenhall village and the Compton canal basin. Features an excellent rear garden with sandstone rock-face, a sizeable through lounge, driveway parking, and a garage * Hall * Through lounge * Dining r..."
A beautifully presented Victorian home with the added benefit of an annex
"* A comfortable 2-bedroom link-detached bungalow on a select Finchfield cul-de-sac, with beautiful gardens, car port, a well-appointed kitchen, and a garden room/utility * Hall * Large living and dining room with full-height, garden facing windows * Kitchen * Garden room/utility * Two bedrooms * ..."
"A luxury TWO BEDROOM retirement apartment. Situated on the FIRST FLOOR in our prestigious THORNEYCROFT development. Further benefits include two WC's, Walk out balcony with garden views. Imposing hallway. MUST BE VIEWED"
A THREE/FOUR BEDROOM PERIODIC COTTAGE IN THE POPULAR LOCATION OF GOLDTHORN. CLOSE TO THE CITY CENTRE AS WELL AS A HUGE RANGE OF LOCAL AMENITIES AND SCHOOLING. EXCELLENT TRAVEL LINKS
"A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME
Comprising entrance hall, downstairs W/C, family lounge, modern kitchen diner, three bedrooms, modern family bathroom plus en-suite, off road parking & garage, & rear gardens with artificial lawn"
"""4/5 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY SITUATED IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, downstairs wc, lounge, large open plan entertainment kitchen diner, 4/5 bedrooms, large Jack and Jill style bathroom, off road parking to front, generous rear garden area."
"Situated in one of the most sought after locations in Tettenhall and easy within walking distance of the Village High Street & the amenities therein, this delightful and most intriguing cottage property provides charming living accommodation with a host of captivating and period features throughout."
"A rare opportunity to purchase a five bedroom family home offering versatile living accommodation and situated in popular residential area in Fallings Park, close to local amenities and schools with easy access to Wolverhampton City centre."
"***VIEWINGS TO BE HELD ON SATURDAY 1ST APRIL - PLEASE CALL TO BOOK YOUR SLOT***Property Solutions Group are pleased to present to the market this three bedroom, terraced house located in Wolverhampton benefitting from a front and rear garden. "
"A four bedroom detached property in a corner position in a quiet cul de sac in Moseley Parklands Wolverhampton. Enter the property into the porch that leads to the hall, downstairs cloakroom and lounge which has double doors to the dining room. Also on the ground floor is the kitchen and conser..."
"Spaced over three floors, this four-bedroom home has everything you need for a picture-perfect life. It features an open-plan downstairs layout, which includes a separate laundry and cloakroom. While four bedrooms on the top two floors offer flexible space for you to use in any way that sui"
"A superb, traditional three bedroom semi-detached property which has been extended to the rear to create a large living kitchen"
 **A FOUR BEDROOM DETACHED HOUSE** **CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION** **CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS & AMENITIES** **CONSERVATORY** **TWO RECEPTION ROOMS** **UTILITY ROOM & DOWNSTAIRS W.C.** **EN-SUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM** **GARAGE AND GATED DRIVEWAY AFFORDING OFF ROAD PARKING** 
"A Stunning Bungalow in a Quiet Cul de Sac in Sought After Area. Enter the property into the hallway, all doors lead off and at the end is a convenient utility store area. A spacious well equipped kitchen with breakfast bar into the dining area; patio doors open up into the rear garden. To the f..."
"Extended four bedroom detached family home situated on a generous plot in popular residential location of Bradmore. Located close to amenities, including; shops, sought after schools at primary & senior levels, colleges and a number of leisure facilities, with further benefits such as pu..."
""" A FANTASTIC 3 STORY 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, downstairs wc, lounge, extended kitchen, 3 bedrooms, en-suite and family bathroom. Off Road parking to font, enclosed rear garden with woodland views to rear."
"Beautifully presented link-detached home in a sought after cul-de-sac location. Extensively refurbished in 2020 the versatile accommodation comprises through living/dining room, re-fitted kitchen, ground floor w.c, ground floor double bedroom, large first floor bedroom and bathroom. Double length..."
"""DETACHED 4/5 BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY IN A CUL DE SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, open plan lounge/ diner, kitchen, utility room, downstairs wc, conservatory to rear, office, 4 bedrooms, ensuite, family bathroom. Large block paved driveway and rear garden."
"Deceptively spacious four bedroom detached family home needing refurbishment situated on immensely sought after road in prime residential location of Wolverhampton offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further ..."
"Deceptively spacious four bedroom semi-detached period family home situated in residential location of Blakenhall offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport available via bu..."
Strike is pleased to present this property in Wolverhampton.
"""A WELL PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs wc, 3 bedrooms, en-suite, family bathroom, garage, off road parking to front, enclosed rear garden."
"**NO UPWARD CHAIN** Delightfully positioned and deceptively spacious 4 Bedroom, 2 Bathroom Semi-Detached House occupying a semi-rural position on the south western city outskirts with field views to the rear yet conveniently placed for access to facilities at nearby Wombourne and Merry Hill. The ..."
"Extended three bedroom semi-detached family home decorated to a high specification throughout situated within cul de sac of popular residential location of Penn. Located within 3.3 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, scho..."
"FREEHOLD. WOLVERHAMPTON CITY COUNCIL TAX BAND C. Large family home in popular area with extensive off street parking. This beautifully presented extended home comprises entrance porch and hallway, lounge, kitchen, dining room, utility room with fitted units, principle bedroom with dressing room, ..."
"BACKING ONTO OPEN COUNTRYSIDE - EXTENDED - LARGE GARDEN - DRIVEWAY PARKING - NO UPPER CHAIN - An extended four bedroom semi-detached family home in the sought after area of Lower Penn, occupying a fantastic plot with stunning views across open countryside. The property comprises; entrance hall wi..."
"""A 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, kitchen diner, lounge, conservatory, three bedrooms, family bathroom and a garage to side. Generous off road parking to front and an enclosed rear garden."
"MUST BE SEEN! - DOUBLE LENGTH GARAGE & CAR PORT - TWO RECEPTION ROOMS - CONSERVATORY - CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION - A superb four bedroom detached family home within a quiet cul-de-sac location in the popular Moseley Parklands area. The property comprises; entrance hall, cloakroom/WC, lounge, se..."
"FREEHOLD AND EPC AWAITED. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a lovely family home in the popular Goldthorn Park area and offered with no upward chain/ The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, interconnected lounge and dining room, fitted kitchen with utility room off, three go..."
"Spacious four bedroom detached family home well-presented throughout situated within sought after modern housing estate overlooking the park. Located 2.2 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure f..."
Tyron Ash Real Estate are very proud to present this stunning four bedroom family home located in a sought after area with convenient access to all amenities. Open the Full Ad to find out more!
"""RECENTLY BUILT 4 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR AREA"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, diner, utility room, downstairs wc, 4 good sized bedrooms, 2 en-suites and a family bathroom. Externally there is a driveway to front and an enclosed rear garden."
DETACHED PROPERTY - SPLIT OVER 3 FLOORS - LARGE GARDEN - IDEAL FAMILY HOME - GOOD LOCATION
"""A CHAIN FREE 3 BEDROOM DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance porch, large open plan lounge/ dining room, kitchen, side storage area/ utility room, 3 good sized bedrooms, large family bathroom, garage, off road parking to front, large enclosed rear garden."
"An extremely well maintained detached bungalow situated in a popular residential area with two double bedrooms and conservatory. This impressive home offers spacious accommodation and benefits from central heating, double glazing, off road parking plus garage and a delightful and private garden t..."
A well presented two bedroom house in this retirement development with the added benefit of a garage
"* Apartment 4 * First-floor, 2-bedroom luxury apartment * In an exclusive canal-side location * Peaceful views over the canal * Within walking distance of amenities * Ground-floor entrance porch * Hall * Lovely large, bright open-plan kitchen, living and dining room * Master bedroom with en suite..."
"Occupying a choice position in a small exclusive cul de sac just off Windsor Avenue & therefore in one of the most favoured locations in Penn, this distinctive detached property is a superb example of a good size family home."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* This is a rare opportunity to acquire this very impressive Four bedroom End Terraced property which occupies a pleasant position and is handily placed for a range of general amenities in the area including local shops, schools, public transport services, Bantock Park just up the..."
"Occupying a choice position in an established residential area this period, Victorian style end of terrace property enjoys both a spacious and versatile lay out of living accommodation over three floors and has been completely refurbished throughout and is complimented by high ceilings and skirti..."
A rare opportunity to purchase a building plot with planning permission for the construction of a substantial family home.
"""AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED 3/4 BEDROOM EXTENDED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, extended second sitting area, extended show room style kitchen, study, ground floor shower room, 3/4 bedrooms and a family bathroom, driveway to front, generous enclosed rear garden."
"Situated in one of the most popular residential areas of Finchfield and within walking distance of schools & shops, this attractive semi-detached property has been restyled to create contemporary and practical living accommodation with the advantage of being neatly decorated throughout "
"Stunning detached home set back from the main road in a highly sought after location with open countryside views to the front. Extended and improved by the current owners the property has a number of outstanding modern features and includes through living/dining room, snug/breakfast room, modern ..."
"""A CHAIN FREE EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM BAY FRONTED TRADITIONAL PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising porch, hall, downstairs shower room, lounge, dining room, two part kitchen, conservatory, three bedrooms, bathroom, garage to side, large off road parking to front & generous rear garden."
"Situated in an established residential area and within easy access of the city centre, this characteristic Victorian semi-detached house has been extensively refurbished by the present owners providing a host of attractive & period features throughout adding to the charm and appeal of this tradition"
"A spacious detached home offering ideal family accommodation at a very affordable price. It is being marketed with the benefit of no upward chain and is conveniently situated on the fringe of Wednesfield town centre and ideally located for all essential  amenities, Bentley bridge retail p..."
"Immensely deceptive detached five bedroom bungalow set back from the main road on a generous plot within sought after residential location with spacious room sizes throughout offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, wi..."
"""A THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms, family shower room, garage to side, front & rear gardens, off road parking."
This is an extensively Extended Modern Four bedroom Semi Detached property occupying a desirable position in a sought after cul de sac location with a range of general amenities in the area and near to Wolverhampton City centre. The property provides extremely spacious well planned family livi...
"""A SUBSTANTIAL 5 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, large open plan lounge/ dining area, second reception room, large kitchen, downstairs shower room, 5 bedrooms, generous family bathroom, garage to rear, enclosed rear garden."
A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO ACQUIRE THIS LOVELY FAMILY HOME WITHIN A POPULAR LOCATION IN WOLVERHAMPTON. DON'T MISS OUT CALL HAART TODAY!
A LARGE 3/4 BEDROOM BUNGALOW WITH PLENTY OF SCOPE FOR DEVELOPMENT. LOCATED IN A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA WITHIN EASY REACH OF THE CITY CENTRE AND WITH EXCELLENT COMMUTER LINKS
Occupying choice position within this mature and generous plot set back off the road this deceptively spacious and versatile bungalow already provides an excellent choice of accommodation but in our opinion would prove ideal for that discerning buyer looking to acquire a property that they ...
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE FIVE/SIX BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising entrance hall, ground floor shower room, 32ft lounge, office/study/play room (potential Bed 6), kitchen, FIVE BEDROOMS, family bathroom, off road parking & enclosed rear garden."
**DO NOT JUDGE A BOOK BY ITS COVER** as the saying goes...... this bungalow is definitely not as it may seem from the front aspect.... Step inside to a sheer Tardis of a property with surprisingly spacious and versatile living and immensely deceptive with all it has to offer. It could be suggest...
"FANTASTIC PURCHASE OPPORTUNITY THREE BEDROOM **EXTENDED** FAMILY HOME LOCATED IN A HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER AREA OF PENN, WOLVERHAMPTON Whitegates Estate Agents have immense pleasure in offering FOR SALE this LARGE well presented, Spacious 1930s home available on Canterbury Roa..."
"""A THREE/FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY SITUATED IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising entrance hall, front reception room, rear extended lounge, large open plan kitchen, ground floor Bedroom with wc, three first floor bedrooms, large family bathroom, off road parking"
A well presented lovely modern three Bed Mid Terrace Property ideally located on the new Ettingshall Persimmon development. with good access to Wolverhampton city centre and Bilston town centre
"
Unexpectedly back on the market An immaculate and well positioned three bedroomed detached property, occupying a quiet position with private driveway parking, garage and private rear garden with seating area. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient ..."
"""A CHAIN FREE WONDERFUL DOUBLE FRONTED DETACHED PROPERTY"" Comprising ground floor wc, dining room, lounge, fitted kitchen, breakfast room, three bedrooms, large family bathroom, garage to side detached, detached garage to rear. The feature of this property being the large landscaped rear garden."
"""AN OUTSTANDING THREE BEDROOM DETACHED PROPERTY IN A SOUGHT AFTER AREA"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom, garage to side, front & rear garden."
A well presented detached property located within the heart of Finchfield which itself offers an abundance of renowned stores and also independent shops as well as being in the catchment area of a number of desired schools. The accommodation has been comprehensively updated and re styled to provi...
"** UNEXPECTEDLY RE-OFFERED FOR SALE DUE TO CANCELLATION - NO UPWARD CHAIN ** Modern style 2 Bedroom Detached Bungalow, well presented and usefully enlarged, situated in a delightful private drive setting just off Church Hill on the established south western city suburbs near to local shopping and..."
"** UNEXPECTEDLY RE-OFFERED DUE TO CANCELLATION - NO UPWARD CHAIN ** Modern style 2 Bedroom Detached Bungalow, well presented and usefully enlarged, situated in a delightful private drive setting just off Church Hill on the established south western city suburbs near to local shopping and amenitie..."
"Save thousands when you reserve the Houghton 3-bedroom home. We’ll contribute up to £5,000* towards your deposit!
"
"**MODERN THREE-BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME COMING TO MARKET SOON - EARLY VIEWING IS ADVISED** Beautifully presented family home situated on a generous plot, in a much-favoured neighbourhood with a good selection of local amenities close by. The interior layout features: Porch; Entrance Hall with ..."
"Extended family home offering superb living accommodation and set within a popular location convenient for local shops, schools, public transport and access to the city centre and M54. Large through living room, spacious dining kitchen, ground floor w.c, four bedrooms, study bathroom, garage and ..."
"A beautifully presented family home in a prime position in a quiet cul de sac in Pendeford. On the market with No Upward Chain. Enter the three bedroom detached property into the porch that leads into the hall. On the ground floor is the open plan lounge / dining room, kitchen, utility, downsta..."
"* NO UPWARD CHAIN* This is a superior and attractive Extended Three bedroom Extended Semi Detached property which is pleasantly situated in a sought after location with a range of general amenities in the area including shops, excellent schools and public transport services."
"""AN OUTSTANDING DETACHED CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs wet room, three generous bedrooms, family bathroom, generous off road parking, garage & a large enclosed rear garden."
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE SPACIOUS TRADITIONAL SEMI DETACHED HOME WHICH REQUIRES VIEWING TO FULLY APPRECIATE"" Comprising lounge, sitting room, adjoining feature entertainment conservatory, kitchen, ground floor shower room, three bedrooms, family bathroom, front & large rear garden with car port to ..."
"""A LARGE CORNER PLOT DETACHED BUNGALOW WITH DOUBLE DETACHED GARAGE TO REAR (IDEAL FOR CONVERSION)"" This CHAIN FREE bungalow comprises of lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, two/three bedrooms (see Agents Note), fitted bathroom, front, side & rear gardens with off road parking & double garage."
"Ideally situated within Bilston town and as such convenient for many local amenities, local METRO Tram and commute beyond. This traditional detached family residence offers deceptively spacious accommodation of two reception rooms, kitchen, generous conservatory, three bedrooms, shower-room, s..."
A recently refurbished semi-detached property standing in a sought after cul-de-sac on the Finchfield / Castlecroft border with a delightful outlook over a central green to the front and a large garden to the rear.
"*Beautifully Presented, Extended Detached Home *Close To Sought After Schools *Garden Room/Office With It's Own WIFI
*Superb Fitted Kitchen/Diner *First Floor Bathroom/WC And Downstairs Shower Room/WC *Block Paved Drive *Rear Garden *Chain Free *Viewing Highly Recommended"
**DETACHED BUNGALOW** **TWO BEDROOMS ** **SPACIOUS** **KITCHEN** **UTI ** **FAMILY BATHROOM** **LOUNGE** **DINING AREA** ** GARAGE** DELIGHTFUL GARDEN TO THE FORE**
** EXCELLENT FAMILY/FIRST TIME PURCHASE ** SUPERBLY APPOINTED AND REFITTED OPEN PLAN KITCHEN AND DINING AREA ** STYLISH CONTEMPORARY FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM ** 20FT LIVING ROOM ** SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION ** THREE BEDROOMS & VIEWING TRULY ESSENTIAL ** NO CHAIN ** This most impress...
"""A MUCH IMPROVED TRADITIONAL EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME SITUATED IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, refitted kitchen, three bedrooms, refitted family bathroom, front & rear gardens, off road parking & garage."
"* A well-proportioned 3-bedroom, modern detached house, perfectly positioned for families. Close to local schools, parks, and other amenities, with two excellent reception spaces, garaging, and a master bedroom with en suite * Hall * Downstairs WC * Lounge * Dining room * Kitchen * Master bedroom..."
"Much extended and improved over the years by the current owners to offer a spacious family home. This traditional semi-detached home requires personal viewing for full appreciation.Situated within this established residential area to the north-west of Wolverhampton, ideal for local amen..."
A THREE STORY HOME READY TO MOVE INTO. Modern showroom standard decorated to a the highest standard throughout and very aesthetically pleasing. This is a unmissable opportunity for a beautiful home in a sought after location in Wednesfield. Upon entering the property into the hallway that leads ...
Fantastic Extended Family Home! Belvoir are delighted to present this beautifully appointed home to the market.
"""A SEMI-DETACHED 4 BEDROOM 3 STORY MODERN STYLE TOWN HOUSE"" Comprising of entrance hall, large modern fitted kitchen, lounge, downstairs wc, 4 bedrooms, en-suite, shower room, family bathroom (no fitted bathroom suite). Garage, off road parking to front and a rear garden."
"* A spacious 2-bedroom retirement property on a pleasant, quiet Tettenhall development, arranged over two floors with a patio garden, a bathroom on each floor, and allocated parking * Large L-shaped living & dining room * Kitchen * Ground-floor shower-room * First-floor bathroom * Master bedroom ..."
"This stunning 3 bedroom semi detached house is situated in the popular location of Tettenhall Wood and is now available for viewings.Offered with no upwards chain this impressive family home is sure to draw attention. The property offers a welcoming entrance hall, two spacious reception rooms...."
A well proportioned and well appointed three bedroom family home is a sought after residential location
"Situation on the second floor of New Wing, set in the exclusive development knows as Wergs Hall & in a most picturesque setting with extensive mature surrounding gardens, internal inspection is highly recommended to appreciate the high standard of living accommodation. "
"* A well-proportioned 3-bedroom semi-detached house in Tettenhall Wood, convenient for Christ Church Infant School and nearby shops. With a garage, a substantial outbuilding, a modern breakfast kitchen, and gated parking * Porch * Hall * Lounge * Dining room * Downstairs WC * Modern breakfast kit..."
"* An ideally located 2-bedroom retirement property in charming Tettenhall, arranged over two floors with a patio garden, a bathroom on each floor, a garage, and allocated parking just outside the front door * Large L-shaped living & dining room * Kitchen * Ground-floor shower-room * First-floor b..."
"A WONDERFULLY presented BUNGALOW positioned within its own generous plot & having been recently refurbished to an excellent standard throughout. With gas central heating & UPVC double glazing, this outstanding property also boasts; reception hallway, attractive lounge-diner, modern refi..."
Located on a popular road conveniently situated between Codsall Village and Tettenhall Green this semi-detached home is in need of some internal re-refurbishment but has been immaculately maintained so therefore offers an opportunity for a first time buyer or perhaps a young couple to update to t...
**TWO-BEDROOM BUNGALOW OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** *Potential to extend subject to relevant planning permission* A delightful two-bedroom bungalow in a pleasantly quiet and much sought-after location in good condition throughout and is within easy reach of a full range of amenities includi...
"Situated in a select cul de sac location just off Merridale Road and therefore convenient for the majority of amenities, in particular within walking distance of Wolverhampton Grammar School, this deceptive detached property offers spacious and well planned living accommodation"
"Occupying a choice cul de sac position located just off Goldthorn Hill and therefore in an established residential area, set well back from the road, this individually designed semi-detached dormer style property offers surprisingly spacious living accommodation with the benefit of bedroom accommoda"
"Extended semi-detached home in a sought after cu-de-sac, very well presented throughout and offering superb accommodation comprising hallway, living room, sitting room, spacious kitchen, utility, ground floor w.c, three generous bedrooms and bathroom. There is a large side garage, driveway and go..."
*Extended Traditional Detached Home *Large Plot *Potential To Extend (subject to planning) *Three Good Sized Bedrooms *Two Reception Rooms *Spacious Breakfast Kitchen *First Floor Bathroom/WC *Chain Free *Drive *Generous Rear Garden *Double Glazed And Central Heated *Viewing Is Essential
PLOT 4 - FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED NEW BUILD FAMILY HOME Developer is now offering Assisted Move on all plots within the development. Please call for more details. Off Plan Reservations Being Taken NOW! CALL TODAY on .
"An absolute delight to bring to market is the superb EXTENDED detached home offering comfortable and spacious family living throughout. Having been in the family for nearly 60 years and well cared for throughout this time, you can see why the vendors resided here for many years and never felt the..."
"L & S Prestige Estates Ltd Are Pleased To Offer For Sale This Well Extended Three Bed Semi Detached Property Being Situated In This Sought After Part Of Wednesfield Having Pleasant Park Views To The Front Aspect. The Property Comprises Of An Entrance Porch, Inner Hallway With Stairs To The F..."
"Boasting a prominent corner position this well presented Detached House offers great potential for extending (subject to Planning Approval).Situated on a popular residential road the property benefits from three good bedrooms, a generous conservatory, guest cloakroom, GAS FIRED CENTRAL HEATING..."
*NO UPWARD CHAIN* Weller Court is a most attractive and imposing development of twenty-one individual executive apartments constructed by Wulfrun Homes in 2002 to a high specification. This tastefully appointed Duplex Apartment/maisonette has spacious living accommodation spread over two floor...
"* A deceptively spacious 3-4 bedroom semi-detached house overlooking beautiful Bantock Park and just a short walk from local schools. With cellaring, off-road parking to the rear, and a versatile second sitting room or ground-floor fourth bedroom * Hall * Dining room * Lounge * Kitchen * Second s..."
"""A SURPRISINGLY SPACIOUS CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, sitting room, fitted kitchen, ground floor wet room, three bedrooms, family bathroom, off road parking, front & rear gardens."
*** BRIDGE VIEW - A BESPOKE DEVELOPMENT OF 3 & 4 BEDROOM HOUSES and 2 BEDROOM BUNGALOWS IN THE DELIGHTFUL VILLAGE OF WHEATON ASTON ***
"Located within a highly desirable part of Wolverhampton, this tree bed semi has been completely renovated to the highest of standards. Viewing is essential!"
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A RECENTLY REFURBISHED CHAIN FREE FOUR BEDROOM THREE STOREY FAMILY HOME"" Comprising hall, lounge, dining room, ground floor wc, modern fitted kitchen, four bedrooms modern bathroom set over two floors, well presented front& rear gardens with off road parking."
"""A DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, 18ft kitchen diner, utility, wc, conservatory, three bedrooms, family bathroom, off road parking & garage, front & rear gardens"
"""A CHAIN FREE WELL PRESENTED MODERN THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising modern fitted kitchen, lounge, sitting room/dining room/play room, downstairs wc, three bedrooms, master en-suite, modern family bathroom, off road parking, front & rear gardens."
"A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME Comprising entrance hall, downstairs W/C, family lounge, modern kitchen diner, four bedrooms, modern family bathroom plus en-suite, off road parking & garage, & rear gardens with decking area."
PLOT 6 - THREE BEDROOM DETACHED NEW BUILD FAMILY HOME Developer is now offering Assisted Move on all plots within the development. Please call for more details. Off Plan Reservations Being Taken NOW! CALL TODAY on .
A modern three bed detached family residence situated within a popular estate within the area
"Strike is pleased to present this property in Wolverhampton. Located in a sought-after location, viewing is a must.  Situated close to Phoenix Nursery School, Phoenix Park and Wolverhampton Train Station. "
"""SIGNIFICANTLY EXTENDED 3/4 BEDROOM PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, conservatory, various use room/ potential bedroom 4, 3 bedrooms, family shower room, off road parking to front, enclosed rear garden."
"Extended two bedroom semi-detached bungalow situated on a generous private plot within immensely sought after residential location of Penn offering no upward chain. Located within 2.9 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, s..."
"No Upward Chain A well presented three bedroomed detached property, occupying a quiet tucked away position with private driveway and a good sized rear garden giving great privacy. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, sc..."
"A modern three bedroom family home in a corner position in a quiet cul de sac. Enter the property into the hall that leads to the light and bright living room with patio doors to the garden. Also on the ground floor is the spacious kitchen/diner, the utility and the cloakroom. On the first flo..."
"If you are looking for a superb detached EXTENDED family home, situated on a fantastic corner plot with already extended living accommodation to the ground floor and further benefits to extend even more, then look no further! This most impressive three bedroom detached house is ..."
"NO CHAIN - Extended three bedroom detached home in a choice cul-de-sac position comprising living room, extended sitting / dining room, kitchen , three generous bedrooms and bathroom. Driveway, garage to the rear, pleasant garden, well located for local shops, schools and public transport."
"Spacious Family End of Terraced Home, Ready to Move Into. Enter the property into the entrance hall that leads to the front reception room and the large light and bright lounge which is open plan into the breakfast bar area of the kitchen diner. Double patio doors from the lounge lead into the g..."
"""A FANTASTIC THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED DOUBLE FRONTED CHARACTER PERIOD PROPERTY"" Comprising feature entrance hall, lounge, dining room, large extended kitchen with utility area, pantry, cellar, three large bedrooms, bathroom, small courtyard area to front, side vehicular access & rear garden."
*Extended And Well Maintained Detached Home *Superb Extended Kitchen/Breakfast Room With Skylights *Popular Residential Location *Three Good Sized Bedrooms *Two Reception Rooms *Drive To Front *Enclosed Rear Garden *Wooden Built Cabin In Garden *Guest WC *Family Bathroom/WC *Viewing Recommended
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE & SPACIOUS CHAIN FREE DETACHED END PLOT PROPERTY WHICH OFFERS FLEXIBLE LIVING ACCOMMODATION"" Comprising off road parking, car port, rear garden with outbuildings, kitchen diner, lounge, wc, FOUR BEDROOMS & GROUND FLOOR HOME OFFICE & UTILITY (annex conversion potential)."
"CHAIN FREE!!!
Located in a most sought after area, is this beautifully presented and deceptively spacious, two/three bedroom link-detached Chalet Dorma-Bungalow. The property benefits from a good sized lounge and has a separate dining room (previously used as a third bedroom). The kitchen breakf..."
Extended traditional-style semi prominently positioned in a quiet neighbourhood within the favoured western suburbs of Wolverhampton city OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN. Enlarged layout offers spacious accommodation well suited to comfortable family occupation and appointed to excellent standard. P...
"An impressive EXTENDED traditional semi detached property located within popular area of Ettingshall Park. Being much improved & stylishly presented, this deceptively spacious family home is double glazed as well as boasting; entrance porch, hallway with storage, good-sized lounge-diner, at..."
"A most attractive Grade II listed Georgian end terrace property, having been extensively improved upon over the years to include the addition of stylish modern fittings, provides surprisingly spacious and versatile living living accommodation, which is ideal for professional persons or a younger ..."
" Lovett&Co. Estate Agents are pleased to offer for sale this immaculately presented three bedroom semi detached house, set on a modern sought after development.   The property has been finished to a show home standard as well as being tastefully decorated throughout. On the ground floor ..."
"A stylishly presented traditional semi-detached property positioned on the highly popular Ettingshall Park estate. This family home has gas central heating & double glazing and briefly comprises; entrance porch, hallway, attractive through lounge, modern fitted kitchen with various integrate..."
"""A PLEASANTLY PRESENTED CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW SITUATED A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL LOCATION"" Comprising pleasant front, side & rear gardens, ample off road parking, detached garage, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen with side porch, three bedrooms and bathroom."
"No upward chain is offered for this spacious and well maintained semi detached property in a sought after residential area in Bradmore, near Penn Fields. The property is well presented and occupies a large private plot allowing plenty of scope to extend. With a driveway to the front allowing..."
"This extended semi detached home offers ideal family accommodation at a very affordable price. It is situated in a popular residential area and conveniently located for all essential amenities, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. The property briefly comprises storm porch, ..."
"This Three Bedroom Semi Detached Property is located on Rochester Avenue in Wednesfield and is very close to amenities such as schools, supermarkets, eateries and has excellent transporting links heading into and out of Wolverhampton including excellent links to New Cross Hospital and Bentley Bri..."
"""A CHAIN FREE AN RARE THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, dining room, downstairs wc, 3 good sized bedrooms, bathroom, separate wc, garage, front garden with off road parking and an enclosed rear garden."
"""A DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS 4 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PERIOD PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, second reception room, extended kitchen, 3 bedrooms, loft room, family bathroom. Large rear gravelled area, large timber shed, small courtyard garden to front."
"Conveniently positioned upon the enormously popular Ettingshall Park estate, this deceptively spacious, traditional family home is stylishly presented & benefits from rear extension. With gas central heating & double glazing, this impressive property also comprises of; entrance porch, ha..."
A deceptively spacious mid terrace property located in the popular finchfield area of the City which is placed within the catchment area of a number of desired schools whilst access to local road networks and shops is also deemed excellent making this property an ideal family ...
Located on a popular road conveniently situated between Codsall Village and Tettenhall Green this semi-detached home is in need internal re-refurbishment yet offers an opportunity for a first time buyer or perhaps a young couple to update to their desired taste. The accommodation includes an entr...
"A fine example of a traditional bay fronted semi -detached property which has undergone considerable improvements by the current owner to create a well presented home located off an established road with accommodation including an entrance hall, lounge, dining kitchen, sun room, three bedrooms, s..."
"""A THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, large lounge diner, recently refitted kitchen, 3 bedrooms, shower room, garage, large driveway to front, delightful enclosed rear garden."
"A delightful semi-detached family home providing well presented accommodation, situated in a much sought after location. This three bedroom property briefly comprises: entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge/diner, conservatory, 'L' shaped kitchen, utility room, ground floor W.C, three b..."
A most impressive property which has been improved to a high standard throughout
"Attractive, ENLARGED & re-configured, gas centrally heated, uPVC double glazed semi detached excellently situated in favoured ""backwater"" upon favoured development briefly comprising; Porch, Reception Hall, Through Living/Dining Room (formerly separate rooms), Conservatory, Enlarged..."
This is an impressive corner positioned Two bedroom Detached Bungalow which is situated in a sought after cul de sac location and is handily placed for a range of general amenities in the area including local shops and public transport services
"""A FANTASTIC CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising entrance hall, two part lounge/dining room, kitchen, downstairs wc, three bedrooms, family bathroom, garage to side, off road parking to front & large rear garden."
"FREEHOLD FAMILY HOME. EPC RATED C. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a well-presented modern family home in Fordhouses. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, guest cloakroom / WC, large lounge/ dining room, fitted kitchen, three bedrooms, and a bathroom/W.C. Externally the..."
A Spacious Detached Family Home Ready to Move Into. Enter the property into the welcoming hall that leads into the lounge and downstairs cloakroom. From the lounge go into the newly renovated kitchen / dining room updated to high standard with breakfast bar and additional space for dining table ...
"We are proud to present this Three Bedroom Detached Bungalow – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price *£260,000 - £280,000*"
"""A HANDSOME 3 BEDROOM BAY FRONTED SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, large 24ft long entertainment lounge dining area, kitchen, 3 bedrooms, bathroom, large gravelled driveway to front and a generous rear garden with rear access via shared road."
"Extended modern-style semi-detached residence of considerable appeal positioned in a pleasant cul-de-sac with local shops in close proximity and with ease of access to motorway links via the M54. Well-presented accommodation having been extended to the rear, creating a larger kitchen, sitting are..."
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A WELL PRESENTED FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED TOWN HOUSE"" Comprising of entrance hall, ground floor shower room, kitchen diner, lounge, bedroom 4/ office, 3 bedrooms master with en-suite, family bathroom, off road parking, front and rear gardens & outbuilding."
"* A 2/3 bedroom detached bungalow at the top of Wightwick Bank, within walking distance of local amenities. Includes an attractive kitchen, two reception rooms, a charming rear garden, and ample off-road parking * Side entrance porch * Inner hallway * Kitchen * Lounge * Dining room / 3rd bedroom ..."
Bhylls Crescent sits within a popular residential location and has local shopping facilities available in Merry Hill and Castlecroft and the city centre is easily accessible. The area is well served by schooling in both sectors. This is an excellent size semi-detached property being so...
"Three bedroom detached family home sitauted on an expansive prime corner plot tucked away in immensely sought after cul de sac location of Compton offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as ..."
"*HMO INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY!* Belvoir are pleased to be presenting to market this now four bedroom semi-detached HMO investment in a sought after residential area of Wolverhampton. The home achieves £1,450.00pcm upon all rooms being occupied and is kept to a good standard throughout."
"NEW LISTING in WOLVERHAMPTON - Semi Detached property enjoying an arrangement of 3 Bedrooms, a Reception Room, a Bathroom, a Kitchen and a Spacious Garden WITH Conservatory and Rear Outhouse, also has double glazing and central heating throughout with a Spacious Front Garden. EPC D"
"A well presented traditional family home. Enter the property into a porch that leads into the hall, doors lead to the kitchen with Utility and door into the garage. There is also a spacious open plan lounge dining room - stairs go to the first floor. On the first floor are two double bedrooms, o..."
"An absolute privilege to bring to market is this most exceptional EXTENDED family home. You can truly see why the vendors enjoyed this property for over 30 years and did not want to sell until now!! If you are looking for a home that offers spacious accommodation throughout, located w..."
"FREEHOLD AND EPC RATED D. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. This is a comprehensively updated family home in the Penn area close to local amenities and popular schools. The accommodation comprises and entrance hall, thought lounge, extended contemporary kitchen/diner, three bedrooms, and ..."
**NO ONWARD CHAIN** Are you looking for a STUNNING 3 bedroom family home? Then this could be the one for you! Built in 2018 and still under the NHBC warranty
Traditional three bed semi detached family home set back from the road situated within a desirable area of Wolverhampton
"**THREE DOUBLE-BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION** Located in a popular position with amenities close by including primary and secondary schools and shops. Benefiting from off-road parking to the front, two reception rooms and a fitted kitchen on the ground floor, three double bedroom..."
"No upward chain… Situated in a popular and established residential area, this tastefully appointed 3 bedroom traditional semi-detached property has been well maintained over the years to create a practical and appealing standard of living accommodation and is also conveniently situated to..."
"Occupying a prime position in one of the most favoured locations in Penn and within easy access of both Wolverhampton city centre, this distinctive semi-detached house has been extended and restyled over the years to create a spacious family property, yet ideal for purchasers requiring a property t"
"A particularly well situated two bedroom, corner second floor apartment in this prestigious retirement development for the over 70s."
"A well located three bedroom family home with a superb rear garden which is over 150 feet in length, standing in a cul-de-sac setting"
"Neatly presented traditional style 3 Bedroom Semi-Detached House situated in an established residential neighbourhood of popularity on the south western suburbs of Wolverhampton, handy for nearby local shopping facilities and with public transport links to the city centre. The layout features: En..."
"""A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising of Entrance hall, ground floor wc, lounge, fitted kitchen, 3 bedrooms family bathroom, front and rear gardens and secure allocated parking."
"An absolute delight to bring to market is this deceptive in its size and neutrally decorated throughout, well-proportioned detached house. Offering a secluded position in a favoured residential location, just off Birchwood Road at the head of the cul de sac with a similar designed prop..."
"""A MODERN DETACHED FAMILY HOME SITUATED ALONG A PRIVATE DRIVE"" Comprising of pleasant front and rear gardens with off road parking and garage to side. Internally there is a fitted kitchen, guest wc, lounge, 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom."
"""A TWO BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED BUNGALOW SITUATED ON A GENEROUS CORNER PLOT IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, conservatory/sun room, kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom, garage, generous off road parking to front & a wrap around side & rear gardens."
"Outstanding semi-detached home is a pleasant cul-de-sa location, beautifully presented with impressive open plan accommodation. Entrance hall, spacious living room leading to a modernised kitchen which in turn open through to a conservatory overlooking the rear garden. Three bedrooms, re-fitted b..."
"""AN EXCELLENT OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, utility, conservatory, three bedrooms, family bathroom, off road parking, garage, front & rear gardens."
"If you are looking for a superbly appointed semi-detached house, located in the highly sought after area of Penn, then this property is going to tick the boxes for you that’s for sure!!! Pleasantly positioned in a consistently popular neighbourhood and well served by local ameni..."
"A superb property to bring to market with the most pleasant living accommodation throughout, situated within a lovely cul de sac location on the outskirts of Wolverhampton within the ever popular Wednesfield area. This spacious and well-presented three bedroom semi-detached fami..."
An absolute privilege to bring to market this most exceptionally presented and greatly improved family home. It’s curb appeal alone demonstrates what you will see internally once you step inside of this property. Truly remarkable in its sheer presentation and once you see the refitted dinin...
"A distinctive, luxury first floor leasehold apartment with charm and character converted within a detached period residence and nestled in a favoured residential neighbourhood. Within easy walking distance of the varied amenities afforded by the picturesque village of Tettenhall. Further more e..."
Situated in one of the most favoured residential areas and within walking distance of Tettenhall Village this luxurious first floor apartment incorporates many characteristic features throughout. 
"Magnolia Court is situated in a popular residential address close to a wide variety of local amenities in Penn and within convenient distance of the further, more wide ranging facilities afforded by the City Centre itself. Furthermore, there are regular bus services running along the Penn Road (A..."
"** EXCEPTIONALLY WELL PRESENTED MODERN SEMI DETACHED HOUSE LOCATED ON THE EVER POPULAR ""AKRON GATE"" DEVELOPMENT ** THREE GENEROUS SIZED BEDROOMS ** GROUND FLOOR GUEST WC ** ENSUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM AND FURTHER FAMILY BATHROOM ** OVERLOOKING PLAYING FIELDS AND LOCAL SUPERMARKET AND NURS..."
"Three bedroom end terrace situated on prime corner plot within popular residential cul de sac location offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport available via bus and rail...."
"""A THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED MODERN STYLED PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, downstairs wc, modern fitted kitchen diner, lounge, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom, courtyard style frontage & enclosed rear garden with gated access to two allocated parking spaces."
"""AN EXTENDED 3 BEDROOM BAY FRONTED SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, large extended kitchen diner, 3 good sized bedrooms, family bathroom, driveway to front, side courtyard, enclosed rear garden with brick/timber constructed storage area."
"""A DETACHED 2 BEDROOM BUNGALOW IN FANTASTIC CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, 2 bedrooms, shower room, garage to side, front driveway and enclosed rear garden."
""" A 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY WITH PLANNING PERMISSION"" This property comprises of entrance porch, entrance hall, 2 reception rooms, kitchen diner, 3 bedrooms and a bathroom, large generous front and rear gardens."
"""A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED & HIGHLY DECEPTIVE SEMI DETACHED HOME"" Comprising off road parking, spacious rear garden with entertainment patio, generous lounge, wonderful open plan refitted breakfast kitchen, conservatory/utility, three bedrooms & fitted family bathroom."
"Incredible three-bedroom first floor executive duplex apartment set on a prestigious residential road in Penn. Located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public transport available via bu..."
"* A very well-presented 2/3 bedroom ground-floor apartment in a beautiful Georgian building, located on a secure, select development overlooking Tettenhall’s Upper Green. With secure gated parking, master en suite, and a versatile third bedroom or reception space * Hall * Lounge * Dining ro..."
"This semi detached home offers ideal family accommodation at a very affordable price. It is situated in a popular and much sought after residential road and is conveniently located for all essential amenities including shops, schools and public transport links. The property briefly comprises, ..."
**NO UPWARD CHAIN** This is a great opportunity to purchase a detached family home in a sought after residential area. The property is in a quiet cul-de-sac and has off-road parking and front garden. Inside the double glazed property you have a spacious lounge leading into a generous sized f...
A most pleasant semi-detached property which has been tastefully decorated and enhanced with modern style furnishings is thought an ideal first time buy or perhaps a purchase for a young couple. Placed most conveniently to local shops and bus routes as well as the amenities of Tettenhall Green Vi...
"""A RARE OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A CHAIN FREE TWO BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW SITUATED IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising of driveway to side leading to garage, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, 2 bedrooms, wet room, sun room/conservatory and a delightful rear garden with woodland walks to rear."
"An absolute pleasure to bring to market is this most delightful bungalow situated on the Staffordshire Border of the City with excellent road network links to surrounding areas to include Cannock, Walsall, Stafford and Shropshire. Neatly tucked away within a pleasant cul de sac locati..."
"""AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED & CHARMING THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY ON THE POPULAR BRIDGNORTH ROAD"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining groom, kitchen, three bedrooms, family bathroom, front, side & rear gardens, garage with rear access (see Agents Note)."
"Beautifully presented three-bedroom semi-detached town style family home situated within a hugely sought after location. Idyllically situated close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public tran..."
CALL SKITTS TO BOOK A PROPERTY VIEWING!!! MUCH IMPROVED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOUSE** **REFITTED KITCHEN/DINER** **REFITTED BATHROOM** **SUMMER HOUSE IDEAL FOR ENTERTAINING** **DRIVEWAY AND GARAGE** **VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED** 
"WELL PRESENTED TRADITIONAL THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOUSE, CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS & AMENITIES, BENEFITTING FROM A REFITTED 'L' SHAPED KITCHEN/DINING ROOM AND REFITTED BATHROOM. ENCLOSED REAR GARDEN, DRIVEWAY & GARAGE AFFORDING OFF ROAD PARKING. Contact us on to a..."
"""A PLEASANTLY PRESENTED AND HIGHLY DECEPTIVE EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED HOME"" Comprising of 24ft entertainment lounge diner, 16ft fitted kitchen diner, utility, kitchen area 2, 28ft side veranda, 3 bedrooms and a fitted family bathroom, off road parking and a large rear garden,"
"L & S Prestige Estates Ltd Are Pleased To Offer For Sale This Spacious Three Bed Semi Detached Property Being Situated In The Villiers Area Of Bilston. The Property Comprises Of A Front Porch, A Spacious Entrance Hallway, A Full Length Lounge/Diner And A Refitted Modern Breakfast Kitchen. "
"Occupying a choice position in a popular residential area with all local amenities including shops, schools and public transport services close by this traditional three-bedroom semi-detached property has been well maintained over the years yet provision still exists for that discerning buyer loo..."
"Occupying a choice position on this extremely popular modern development, within easy access of the city centre & majority of amenities, this modern semi-detached family house has been styled by the present owners to create a stunning, first class home!"
"Spacious and bright, The Lawrence boasts an open-plan living-dining room, making it the perfect space for entertaining.  With its three generously sized bedrooms, with en-suite to the master, The Lawrence proves to be the ideal family home.
For parking information please"
A well presented two bedroom end terrace residence in a sought after location.
A superior penthouse apartment providing exceptional accommodation in a highly regarded period conversion in an exceptionally prestigious and sought after address
Situated in an established residential area this deceptive semi-detached property has been extended and restyled over the years to provide versatile and spacious living accommodation ideal as a family house with extensive views towards the city centre. 
Set on a generous plot and tucked away off the popular and convenient Oxbarn Avenue this semi detached bungalow is indeed need of updating but offers the new purchaser the opportunity to re style and update to their own personal requirements. Subject to planning permissions there is also ample ro...
"Set along one of Wolverhampton's most established roads this mid terrace home is placed between Newbridge and Tettenhall village with both offering a variety of independent shops, hairdressers and restaurants with the added benefit of West Park and also Tettenhall Green being close by respectivel..."
Outstanding three bedroom modern semi-detached residence on the northern outskirts of Wolverhampton with easy access to the motorway network situated in a highly sought-after location. Well-presented accommodation with the bonus of air conditioning in the Living Room and Master Bedroom this famil...
"""A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A STUNNING THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY HOME SET OVER THREE FLOORS"" Comprising entrance hall, ground floor wc, kitchen diner, lounge, three bedrooms, family bathroom, master en-suite, off road parking, front & rear gardens."
"A four bedroom, end terraced property located just off the popular Tettenhall Road. Close to the city centre with great travel links."
"""A CHAIN FREE FANTASTIC THREE BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY SITUATED IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising entrance hall, generous lounge, good size kitchen diner, downstairs wc, three good size bedrooms, en-suite family bathroom, garage, small courtyard style garden to front & low maintenance rear garden."
"**FANTASTIC PURCHASE OPPORTUNITY** VIEWINGS HIGHLY ADVISED TO FULLY APPRECIATE WHAT THIS PROPERTY HAS TO OFFER** CORNER PLOT WITH HUGE POTENTIAL STP The property is situated a short distance from the Stafford Road, giving excellent transport links to Wolverhampton City Cent..."
NO UPWARD CHAIN- 12 Months FREE service charge Occupying a prime position overlooking lovely communal landscaped grounds together with a mature wooded aspect within this small exclusive development of retirement homes this recently vacated property is located within the highly sought after and ...
Well presented three bedroom semi-detached house located on the sought after Beechwood Avenue.
"Attractive, Freehold, gas centrally heated & uPVC double glazed semi detached in favoured neighbourhood that has been conscientiously maintained over the years but would benefit from a little sympathetic updating. Offering potential the accommodation provides; Porch, reception hall, fitted c..."
"Stunning three bedroom EXTENDED semi-detached house, immaculately presented throughout with an extended side annexe accommodating a kitchen/living area, double bedroom and ground floor wet room. An absolute pleasure to bring to market is this most beautifully presented and surpr..."
"** Converted Garage! ** ** Open-Plan Living Room/Diner/Study! **Belvoir are delighted to present this wonderful three bedroom home that has been immaculately kept and impressively improved by its current occupiers. Located in the popular area of Pendeford, this delightful home is perfec..."
"Extended modern home situated on a highly popular residential development. It is ideally located for Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. The well planned and ideal family accommodation briefly comprises, reception hall with guest cloaks, living room, garden room, breakfast ..."
"Occupying a choice position on a popular and established development this detached property has been sympathetically re-styled by the present owner to incorporate modern lines of high quality appointments throughout, providing present day lifestyle requirements. This well presented modern home ..."
IN NEED OF REPAIR & RE-FURBISHMENT - POTENTIAL TO EXTEND (STPP) - ADDITIONAL PLOT OF LAND WITH POTENTIAL FOR GARAGE (STPP) - 4 DOUBLE BEDROOMS - 3 RECEPTION ROOMS - A four bedroom end terraced property located just off the sught after Tettenhall Road which is in need of repair and re-furbish...
"A superb property to bring to market with the most pleasant living accommodation throughout, situated within a lovely cul de sac location on the outskirts of Wolverhampton within the ever popular Wednesfield area. This spacious and well-presented three bedroom bay fronted tradit..."
"Offered with no upward chain a three bedroomed semi detached property, occupying a quiet position with driveway parking and a good sized rear garden with outbuildings housing the Utility area. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transpo..."
"A Property with Potential to Modernise and Make Your Home. This semi-detached bungalow is in a prime position at the top of a quiet cul de sac in Bradmore Wolverhampton. In need of updating and sold with no chain. Enter into the hall that leads to the lounge, kitchen/diner, bathroom, Bedroom on..."
"If you are looking for a property you can move straight into, this immaculately presented three bedroom semi detached house may just be the one for you! Well placed to major commuting links including M54/M6 motorways and a direct road network into Wolverhampton City Centre. ..."
*SITTING IN A HUGE PLOT WITH MASSIVE EXTENSION OR BUILD POTENTIAL!* *A PLOT SIZE OF JUST OVER A TENTH OF AN ACRES!* Belvoir are truly delighted to be presenting to market this unique three bedroom semi-detached family home to the sales market. A property that cannot be missed!
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A CHAIN FREE SPACIOUS EXTENDED THREE BEDROOM DETACHED HOME"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, shower room, modern fitted kitchen, conservatory, three bedrooms, shower room, off road parking, front & rear gardens & brick built shed."
"""AN FANASTIC THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, large kitchen diner, three bedrooms, family bathroom, detached garage to rear, off road parking to front, car port & enclosed rear garden."
"This semi detached home occupies a corner plot in a quiet backwater within a popular residential neighbourhood. It is conveniently situated for all essential amenties,public transport links, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge Retail park. The ideal family accommodation is in need of so..."
"*Double Storey Extension *Semi Detached Home *Three Double Bedrooms *Two Reception Rooms *Extended Kitchen *Generous Drive And Fore Garden *Potential o Extend (subject to planning) *Ideal First Time Buy *Close To Good Schools, Shops And Amenities *Conservatory *Rear Garden *Viewing Is Essential"
"NO CHAIN - Spacious three bedroom semi-detached home in a cul-de-sac location in the favoured area of Penn, well located for access to shops, Penn Common, bus routes into the city centre and the highly regarded St. Bartholomews Primary School. Living room, dining room, kitchen, modernised bathroo..."
"Spacious, gas centrally heated, uPVC or hardwood double glazed three bedroom semi detached that has been conscientiously maintained & improved over the years and now requiring a little sympathetic updating briefly comprising; Reception hall, store, lounge, dining room, upgraded kitchen, Three..."
Exceptionally spacious traditional-style semi-detached property in popular neighbourhood with a good selection of local amenities conveniently accessible. Superbly proportioned accommodation and excellent standard plus scope for little upgrading. Internal inspection is essential to appreciate the...
"For Sale by MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, Starting Bid £235,000 plus Reservation Fee. **A CHAIN FREE DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN THE POPULAR GOLDTHORN PARK AREA WITHIN THE MOST DELIGHTFUL CUL DE SAC LOCATION** Comprising of a through living/dining room, kitchen, useful uti..."
"Situated in a popular residential area convenient for the majority of amenities including walking distance of Spring Vale Primary School & Cazzers Park, this traditional semi-detached property has been extended over the years to provide a spacious and well-planned designed home!"
"Presenting a traditional three-bedroom semi-detached property, within a cul-de-sac setting in the established and popular residential area of Claregate, to the Northwest of Wolverhampton.This exceptionally presented family home has been much loved and well kept over the years and benefi..."
"""A STUNNING SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN AN OUTSTANDING CONDITION WITH LOTS OF CHARACTER CHARM"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, separate dining extended dining room, extended kitchen, downstairs wc, utility, two bedrooms, family bathroom, garage, off road parking and an enclosed rear garden."
"One word can only describe this property and this is simply **STUNNING** A privilege to bring to market is this three bedroom semi-detached property, having undergone almost complete renovation by its current vendors to offer a home ready to just put your furnishings in, relax a..."
"Looking for a house to make your home, then take a look at this extended three bedroom semi-detached property. Enter the property into the hallway that leads to the front living room, the extended lounge and the kitchen. From the kitchen is a utility and a downstairs cloakroom/wet room. On the ..."
*Beautifully Presented Semi Detached Home *Sought After Location *Three Bedrooms *Car Port And Drive *Tastefully Decorated Lounge/Dining Room *Modern Fitted Kitchen*Conservatory *Family Bathroom *Rear Garden *Potential To Extend (subject to planning) *Viewing Is Highly Recommended
**NO UPWARD CHAIN!!** A Home Ready to Move Into. An Ideal First Home. Enter the property into the hall that leads to the lounge and downstairs cloakroom. Also on the ground floor is the spacious kitchen/diner. On the first floor is the master bedroom with en-suite and two further bedrooms and t...
"We are proud to present this Three Bedroom Semi Detached House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £230,000 - £240,000*"
"FREEHOLD. EPC RATING E. NO ONWARD CHAIN. This three bedroom semi detached family home is available now. Comprising of large lounge, kitchen, conservatory, two double bedrooms, single bedroom, family bathroom and downstairs W/C."
"Situated in a popular residential area convenient for the majority of amenities and within walking distance of Tettenhall Village with the amenities therein, this deceptive and attractive terraced property has been extended and restyled to deliver a high standard of living accommodation."
"*A HUGE, MUST SEE LAYOUT!* If you're in the property market for hugely spacious four bedroom family home sitting close to The Black Country Route with easy access to the M6 and Wolverhampton City centre, look no further than Beckett Street! The property has a genuine 'must see' internal layout..."
"A corner plot three-bedroom semi-detached family home situated within a hugely sought after residential location with prospects for developing the land that wraps around the property (subject to the correct planning permissions) Conveniently located close to essential amenities, including; s..."
"Haart Estate Agents are delighted to offer for sale this well presented 3 bed family home situated, close to an excellent range of local amenities, excellent public transport links to Wolverhampton, Birmingham, Dudley, and near the hugely popular Manor Academy as well as colleges"
Completed in 2012 by renowned builder 'Persimmon Homes' this contemporary family home has been maintained by the current owners to a high standard and offers contemporary living synonymous with present day lifestyle requirements. The property itself is located within easy access to the convenienc...
"""A FANTASTIC THREE BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising driveway to side, garage to rear, kitchen, large lounge, dining room, three bedrooms, family bathroom & attic space."
"Need to be seen to appreciate the size and layout of this Four Bedroom Home. This property is the ideal investment and project property. Offering, Two reception room, extra large rear garage, four bedrooms, Kitchen and Bathroom. Call Now on to get your chance to view!!!"
"""A FANTASTIC & TRADITIONAL 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY WITH GARAGE TO SIDE"" Comprising of porch, entrance hall, separate lounge, dining room, 2 part kitchen, garage to side, 3 good size bedrooms, family bathroom, Off road parking to front, a delightful enclosed rear garden."
"Located in one of the most sought after areas and tucked away at the end of a close, is this well presented three bedroom modern semi-detached home. The property is close to all local amenities, schools and shops and has great access and transport links into central Wolverhampton and surrounding..."
"** Huge Refurbishment Potential! ** ** Incredibly Popular Location! **Belvoir are delighted to present this beautiful three bedroom semi-detached home in Wednesfield, not too far from New Cross Hospital. There is heaps of potential available at Fairview Crescent, from internal redecorat..."
"If you are looking for a superb EXTENDED semi-detached first time purchase or family home, neatly positioned within a cul de sac location and situated on a fantastic plot, then this may just be the one for you on that property search of yours!! On your first arrival to Tyning Close you..."
"""AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED TRADITIONAL THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY"" Comprising lounge, dining room, kitchen, conservatory, three bedrooms, family shower room, off road parking to front & large rear garden with detached garden room with various usage options (home office/gym/hobby room)"
"If you need an EXTENDED semi-detached property with FOUR bedrooms, set within a lovely quiet cul de sac, that you can grow into and adapt more to make a fantastic family home for many years to come, then look no further!! This is such a lovely property, located just of Broad Lan..."
FREEHOLD. EPC RATED G. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND C. FOR SALE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. This is a semi-detached family home on a large plot with fields to front and rear and having a small barn to the rear that has previously had planning for conversion. The accommodation compr...
"WRITE UP 1 This beautiful, spacious family home is newly modernised and offers no upward chain - an opportunity not to be missed. Situated in an ideal area just off East Park, within walking distance to local schools, shops and amenities, as well as public transport links and easy access to moto..."
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A CHAIN FREE SPACIOUS WELL PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising of entrance hall, ground floor wc, lounge, fitted kitchen 3 bedrooms, en-suite to the master bedroom and a family bathroom. Secure off road parking to rear with front and rear gardens."
"Viewings are essential for this charming ay-fronted semi detached family home in a sought after area. With a driveway to the front providing off road parking, and a meticulously maintained enclosed garden to the rear, the property itself features a spacious living/dining room, fitted kitchen, th..."
FREEHOLD. EPC RATING C. NO ONWARD CHAIN. This is a semi detached family home in the popular Claregate location of Wolverhampton within walking distance to Claregate Primary School. This is an ideal home for families looking for a spacious home in a cul de sac location with ample parking.
"""A CHAIN FREE THREE STOREY TOWN HOUSE SITUATED IN A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA"" Comprising lounge, kitchen, ground floor wc, three good size bedrooms, master en-suite, family bathroom, integral garage, off road parking & a low maintenance rear garden."
*JOIN US FOR AFTERNOON TEA - WEDNESDAY 19th APRIL- 10am - 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* An immaculately presented TWO BEDROOM retirement apartment situated on the FIRST FLOOR in our prestigious ALGAR COURT development.
"""A PLEASANTLY PRESENTED SEMI-DETACHED HOME SITUATED ON A LARGE PLOT WITHIN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of off road parking, front and rear gardens, lounge, dining room with adjoining kitchen area, guest wc, utility, 3 bedrooms and a fitted bathroom."
"***This property is affected by historical mining activity with report available upon request*** A particularly delightful detached family residence, offering spacious accommodation that must be seen to be appreciated. This well maintained four bedroom home benefits from numerous noteworthy..."
Occupying a choice first floor position with a most pleasant elevated aspect this spacious two -bedroom property is situated within a stylish development which in part was known as the Old Spinney club and restaurant which in 2002 was sympathetically re-developed by Wulfrun Homes creating a lovel...
"A Good Sized Family Home Ready to Move into. On entrance the property has a large hall with storage areas for coats and shoes, leading to a spacious lounge with French doors into the rear garden. At the front of the house is the second reception room, currently used as a dining room. Also on the..."
"""A WELL PRESENTED THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising entrance hall, large open plan lounge, modern fitted kitchen diner, three bedrooms, family bathroom, garage to side, off road parking to front & a highly maintained rear garden."
"""A CHAIN FREE 2 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED BUNGALOW IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, 2 bedrooms, shower room, conservatory, generous rear garden and a crete print driveway to front."
"Two bedroom semi detached bungalow situated within sought after residential location offering no upward chain. This freehold residence presents a fine purchase opportunity suitable for a variety of different buyer types. High levels of interest are expected, and as such all interested..."
"""A PERFECT FAMILY HOME, THIS 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY SITS IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, generously proportioned kitchen diner, 3 bedrooms, family shower room, off road parking to front, side gated access, enclosed rear garden."
"""A CHAIN FREE GENEROUSLY PROPORTIONED THREE BEDROOM THREE STOREY FAMILY PROPERTY IN A GATED DEVELOPMENT"" Comprising entrance hall, downstairs wc, large open plan entertainment kitchen diner, utility room, lounge, three bedrooms, family bathroom, front & rear gardens & off road parking."
"""A HIGHLY DECEPTIVE TRADITIONAL AND EXTENDED SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH GARAGE TO REAR"" Comprising or spacious lounge with adjoining dining area, large kitchen, selection of 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom, pleasant front and rear gardens and a garage to rear."
"""A WELL PROPORTIONED THREE BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising large open plan lounge, kitchen, three double bedrooms, family bathrooms. large crete print driveway affording off road parking, garage & enclosed rear garden with rear gated access."
"*Well Presented And Well Maintained Extended Semi Detached Home *Close To Good Schools, Shops And Amenities *Three Bedrooms *Two Reception Rooms *Cloakroom/WC *Extended Fitted Kitchen *Modern Family Bathroom/WC
*Generous Rear Garden *Imprinted Concrete Drive For Ample Parking"
"""A CHARMING TOWN HOUSE PROPERTY WITHIN A CONVERTED PERIOD BUILDING & OFFERING GATED SECURE REAR ACCESS"" Comprising - entrance hall, ground floor wc, generous lounge area with separate kitchen area, two bedrooms, fitted bathroom."
"Extended traditional three-bedroom semi-detached family home in a sought after location of Wednesfield close to new cross hospital and Bentley bridge with great access to the M6/M54. Set close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure fa..."
"A LARGE THREE / FOUR BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME IN A POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA WITH TWO RECEPTION ROOMS, TWO BATHROOMS & LARGE DRIVEWAY"
"""A CHAIN FREE THIS DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY SITUATED ON A POPULAR LOCATION WITHIN WEST PARK"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, three bedrooms, family bathroom, loft space & rear garden."
"Occupying a choice position on a popular modern development just off Bushbury Lane, within easy access of the city centre & the majority of amenities, including walking distance of local schools, shops and only 2.5 miles to the M54 motorway, this modern semi-detached townhouse is an excellent exampl"
"Stunning Three bedroom Detached house on a spacious Corner Plot. This property is one not to be missed. Comprising of Kitchen Diner, Lounge, Three Bedrooms, Bathroom and Conservatory. This property also offers excellent Transport links and local amenities. Call Now on !!!"
"Occupying a prime private position in a small cul de sac just off the A449 Stafford Road and therefore is a most popular residential area, this detached bungalow is an excellent example of its type providing a well planned living accommodation, ideal for purchasers requiring a property to restyle to"
"Calling Small Families and Couples - Looking for a Family Home to make your own?! Located in WOLVERHAMPTON including a Reception room, 3 BEDROOMS with a downstairs W.C. and an upstairs Bathroom. Has Rear and Front Garden with Driveway! Close to shops, amenities and nearby transport links. EPC D"
"THIS IDEAL SPACIOUS FAMILY HOME is a large traditional end terraced house with off road parking and it is ideally situated for all local amenities including New Cross Hospital, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. There are public transport links close by giving easy access ..."
"**CHAIN FREE** A THREE Bedroom Semi Detached Family Home with accommodation briefly comprising, Enclosed Entrance Porch, Hallway, Lounge, Dining Room and Kitchen on the Ground floor with THREE Bedrooms and a Family Bathroom on the First floor. Externally the property offers Front and Rear Gardens..."
A modern and immaculately presented three bedroom detached bungalow.
A particularly spacious townhouse providing extensive living accommodation over three floors in a sought after Finchfield address.
"Viewings are highly recommended for this very well presented and maintained character cottage in a sought after area of Tettenhall Wood. The property has been modernised throughout and features a spacious living room, breakfast kitchen, two double bedrooms and a family bathroom. To the rear i..."
"This excellent detached bungalow offers two sizeable bedrooms, a living room, a fitted kitchen/diner and a four-piece bathroom. The home also boasts a rear garden and a driveway. This property presents a fantastic opportunity for property hunters. "
"Delightful three bedroom home with no upward chain offering ideal family accommodation at a very affordable price. Benefiting from extended kitchen, dining room, two reception rooms and downstairs WC. Conveniently situated for all local amenities including shops, schools and transport li..."
"**VACANT POSESSION** THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED HOME IN HIGHLY SOUGHT AFTER LOCATION IN WOLVERHAMPTON WITH HUGE POTENTION Whitegates have pleasure in offering FOR SALE this three-bedroom home situated on the popular Lower Prestwood Road, Wolverhampton. The property itself ..."
Extended three bedroom semi detached in a much sought after location with spacious accommodation and a good sized rear garden
A well-appointed ground floor apartment providing spacious accommodation in a convenient location.
"Situated in a popular residential area within easy access of the city centre, this traditional semi-detached bungalow offers surprisingly spacious living accommodation and is an excellent opportunity for purchasers requiring a house to restyle to own requirements. "
"L & S Prestige Estates Ltd Are Pleased To Offer For Sale This Superbly Presented Three Bedroom Semi Detached House Situated On The Popular Oaklands Estates In Wednesfield. The Living Accommodation Comprises Of An Entrance Hallway, Spacious Through Lounge/Diner, Modern Fitted Kitchen And A Co..."
"A spacious and well-designed two-bedroom apartment, The Gennings offers a bright and open kitchen-living space, which is the perfect place for entertaining. With two Juliet balconies, it’s the perfect home for lazy summer nights, letting the outside in.
 "
"Offered with no upward chain, a well presented and much improved three bedroomed semi detached property, occupying a quiet position with a block paved driveway and private rear garden. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links..."
"**THREE BEDROOM HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Traditional semi, nicely situated in popular locality with easy access to motorway network and schooling. In need of modernisation the property comprises, Porch and Hall. Two Living Rooms. Kitchen. Conservatory with door t..."
"Traditional three bedroom mid terrace family home situated in residential location within 0.8 mile of Wolverhampton city centre offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport ava..."
"Stunning & Immaculate Home Ready to Move Into. Take a look, you will not be disappointed - enter into the hallway that leads to the spacious lounge with media wall and patio doors into the garden. Also on the ground floor is the beautifully presented kitchen, utility, cloakroom and downstairs to..."
"A delightful end terraced property occupying a prominent corner position in an extremely popular residential area. This spacious family home with three double bedrooms is presented throughout to a high standard and must be seen to be appreciated. The property benefits from two reception rooms,..."
"Agreed are delighted to offer for sale this substantial two bedroom semi-detached house situated in the popular village of Wednesfield in Wolverhampton. The property is within walking distance of local amenities. Offering one reception room and one bathroom, the property benefits from having gas ..."
"If you're in the market for a spacious three bedroom semi-detached home with no upward chain, vacant possession and being close to local amenities, schools and transport links, look no further than Plascom Road! The home offers huge cosmetic potential internally whilst being in a more than liv..."
"This extended semi detached home is being sold with the benefit of no chain. It is situated in a quiet cul-de-sac on a  much sought after residential development and is ideally located for all essential amenities, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park.The accommodation is..."
"Beautifully presented 3 bedroom semi detached with a Modern Kitchen, Modern Shower Room, Conservatory and Off street parking,"
"Perfect Family Home for first time buyers in an extremely popular location, This beautiful Three Bedroom Semi Detached Home offers parking for multiple cars, excellent transport links and close local amenities, Large Rear Garden and Two Reception Rooms. Call now on to view!!!"
"This is a very spacious property with moderate work required to bring it up to date. As such, it represents a great opportunity for any buyer seeking an excellent investment. A lovely semi-detached home close to the centre of Wolverhampton, the property offers a range of benefits. From its large..."
"CHAIN FREE!!! Located close to all amenities, schools, Newcross Hospital and Wolverhampton town centre, is this deceptively spacious Three bedroom detached character house.
The property is currently tenanted and the seller would prefer to sell to prospective Landlords or Investors however, this ..."
"For Sale by MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, Starting Bid £210,000 plus Reservation Fee. This TWO bedroom detached bungalow is being sold on a corner plot position with NO UPWARD CHAIN and is situated on a quiet Pendeford cul-de-sac, close to local amenities and surrounded by similarly ..."
"Extended three bedroom semi-detached family home presented well throughout situated in popular residential location. Located within 3.2 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with fu..."
"Situated in one of the most favoured locations in Penn and convenient for the majority of amenities including schools and shops, this characteristic semi-detached property is a fine example of a family home, ideal for purchasers requiring a property ready to just move into."
This stunning 3 bedroom semi detached home offers an open plan kitchen/diner to the front of the home and separate spacious living room with French doors to the rear overlooking the garden. It also features a ground floor cloak room off the hallway. The first floor consists of three be...
"*** ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS*** Hadleigh Estate Agents are pleased to offer this delightful two bedroom apartment finished to the highest specification. Located in the heart of Wolverhampton close to all local amenities including shops, restaurants, places of education and worship, Wo..."
"* An impressively spacious 2-bedroom ground-floor apartment in a select Wightwick development surrounded by glorious grounds. With ample parking, a private entrance door from a sizeable patio, and a large living and dining space with wonderful garden views * Hall * Kitchen * Large living and dini..."
"A THREE BEDROOM Semi Detached Family Home with Well Proportioned Rooms including Through Lounge/Diner, Kitchen and Garage to the Ground Floor. To the First Floor there is a Family Bathroom, Two Double Bedrooms and One Single Bedroom. Externally the property offers a Sunny Aspect Rear Garden and D..."
"We are proud to offer this Four Bedroom End Terrace House – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £205,000 - £215,000*"
"For Sale by MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, Starting Bid £200,000 plus Reservation Fee. This is a rare opportunity to purchase a ""move-in-ready"" property that has been recently renovated throughout to a superb standard and this is most clearly seen once you visit that’s..."
No upward chain is offered for this spacious detached home in a sought after residential area. The house is one of only six detached properties in the quiet cul-de-sac. Approached via a private driveway leading to secure off road parking and detached garage. To the rear is a manageable priva...
"*JOIN US FOR AFTERNOON TEA - WEDNESDAY 19th APRIL- 10am - 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* OFFERS IN THE REGION OF £200,000 Highly desirable two bedroom, two bathroom, retirement apartment in our prestigious Algar Court development. Part of our retirement living range of properties."
"NO CHAIN - Three bedroom detached property in a popular cul-de-sac location, requiring a scheme of internal modernisation. Driveway providing off road parking, open plan living room, dining kitchen, conservatory, three bedrooms, bathroom, double length garage and garden to rear. Well located ..."
"Attractive three bedroom end-terraced home occupying a generous plot in a popular location. The versatile accommodation comprises entrance hall, separate living and sitting rooms, kitchen, ground floor w.c, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom and an enclosed garden to the rear."
"Dixons are proud to present you with this fully refurbished, chain free, modern three bedroom end terrace family home. Set in a hugely popular area of Ashmore Park within walking distance of local amenities and transport links. This superb property is surrounded by greenery and boasts a main..."
"NO CHAIN - CASH BUYERS ONLY are sought for this double fronted, detached bungalow of non-standard construction. Situated in a highly sought after location, the property has a driveway providing off road parking and comprises reception hall, living room, sitting room, two double bedrooms and bathr..."
"For Sale by MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, Starting Bid £200,000 plus Reservation Fee. An excellent opportunity to purchase a partly renovated three bedroom traditional semi-detached house by way of The Modern Method of Auction. This is a home that you can redesign and wit..."
** Nearby Local Amenities and Transport Links! ** ** Pendeford Village! ** Are you looking for a spacious family home with amazing travel links and easy access to schools? Then look no further! This wonderful home located in Pendeford Village is offered in great conditi...
This property is being sold through our Advanced sales method to provide complete transparency and security for all parties involved - see full details for more info. This is a three-bedroom traditional semi-detached family home in a popular location with potential for development (STP) With off ...
"Situated within a affluent quiet cul-de-sac road in Finchfield, Bramblewood Drive offers a fantastic opportunity for buyers to take advantage of this great opportunity to acquire this detached family home"
"FREEHOLD. WOLVERHAMPTON CITY COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC RATING C. Positioned in the popular Ashmore Park location on a desirable road with links to Kitchen Lane, with off street parking and enclosed rear garden. Accommodation comprises of entrance hall, utility room, kitchen, lounge, conservatory, t..."
Immaculate Two Bedroom Semi Detached home in an extremely popular residential estate. Offering great local ammenities and nearby links to Wolverhampton City Centre and Bilston Town Centre all within two mile radius of this beautiful estate. Viewing needed to be truly appreciated.
"PROPERTY SUMMARY - **ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS** ONE NOT TO BE MISSED**GREAT STARTER HOME** THREE BEDROOMS**20FT LIVING/DINING ROOM** What a little gem of a property this is! Situated in the highly sought after location of Ashmore Park, Wednesfield, close to local bus routes in..."
"A spacious and EXTENDED three bedroom semi-detached house conveniently located for Wednesfield and Bentley Bridge Retail Park along with New Cross Hospital, the property is well placed to both local amenities and road network links in and out of the City. Having been its current home ..."
"Situated in the heart of the community within easy access to neighbouring schools, shops and local amenities. This well presented three bedroom semi detached property requires viewing to truly appreciate the living accommodation on offer."
MyNewStreet present this lovely Three Bedroom Semi-Detached family home for a quick sale.
Belvoir are pleased to present this wonderful home offered as a fantastic renovation project for a family or investor. This detached home is set slightly back from the road with a front garden and driveway. The driveway links to the rear of the property giving access to the garden and garage.
"ATTRACTIVELY PRICED - FREEHOLD, COUNCIL TAX BAND B - Original Victorian Features - Ideal Family Home - Cellar With Electricity - En-Suite To Master - Fitted Wardrobes - Popular Location - Close To Local Amenities & Schools - Excellent Transport & Road Links - Front & Rear Gardens - Double Glazing..."
"Two bedroom semi-detached house immaculately presented throughout situated in popular modern residential housing estate. Located within one mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, wit..."
"**THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN QUIET CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Having large off road parking to the fore and detached garage, an entrance hall with doors leading to two reception rooms and a kitchen. On the first floor are two double bedrooms, a single bedroom and a fa..."
"Traditional Family Home at the Top of a Quiet Cul de Sac.. Enter the property into the hall that leads to the lounge with a feature wood burner, a window looks out over the front view of the property. To the back of the property is the dining area and kitchen. On the first floor are two double b..."
"""A CHAIN FREE TRADITIONAL SEMI DETACHED HOME SITUATED JUST OFF DEYNCOURT ROAD"" Comprising front & rear gardens with off road parking, lounge, sitting/dining room, conservatory, fitted kitchen, three bedrooms & family bathroom."
CASH OFFERS ONLY ! Occupying a slightly elevated position in a popular and established residential area this traditional three bed detached property is in need of an extensive course of modernization throughout and provision exists to further extend the footprint of the property subject to plann...
"A stylish first floor apartment providing contemporary, two bedroom accommodation in a sought after location"
"PUBLIC NOTICE - 26 The Avenue - We are in receipt of an offer of £230,000 subject to contract for this property. Anyone wishing to place a higher offer must do so before legal exchange of contracts. This property has to stay on the market until exchange of contracts with a public notice once ..."
"No upward chain is offered for this spacious and very well maintained semi detached property in a sought after residential area of Bilston. With off-road parking by way of a private driveway to the front and a generous enclosed garden to the rear, the property itself is in excellent condition an..."
"* A well-presented 3-bedroom mid-terrace house within walking distance of Tettenhall’s charming High Street, having a spacious lounge, breakfast kitchen, and an attractive low-maintenance garden * Ideal for a first time buyer or investor * Porch * Lounge * Breakfast kitchen * Bathroom * Two..."
"This Three Bedroom Semi Detached Property is located on Lambert Road and is placed within close proximity to many amenities nearby such as Schools, Supermarkets, Eateries and Transport Links taking you in to and out of Wolverhampton. Internally the property has two reception rooms, a kitchen whic..."
"Public Notice: 3 Waterside Close, Wolverhampton, WV2 1HN. We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £210,000. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers to the Selling Agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. EPC Rating: D FREEHOL..."
"A well-proportioned two bedroom apartment, standing in a popular and sought after development."
"**THREE/FOUR BEDROOM EXTENDED FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION - CLOSE TO LOCAL SCHOOLS AND AMENITIES** Rear allocated off road parking, three reception rooms, downstairs wet room and upstairs family bathroom, fitted kitchen and double glazing. VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED, CALL TO ARRANGE YOUR A..."
"""A THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE FAMILY PROPERTY IN A POPULAR LOCATION"" Comprising porch, entrance hall, two reception rooms, kitchen, three double bedrooms, family bathroom, off road parking, side shared gated access & rear garden."
"""A CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED PROPERTY WITH STUNNING LARGE FAMILY GARDEN TO REAR"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, extended dining room, kitchen, conservatory, three good size bedrooms, bathroom, garage, brick built workshop, off road parking to front & large rear family garden."
"""A CHAIN FREE TRADITIONAL SEMI-DETACHED HOME, OFFERING FIELD VIEWS TO REAR"" Comprising off road parking, integral garage, large rear garden, ground floor guest wc, 21ft lounge, kitchen side entrance/ utility, 2 bedrooms and a fitted family bathroom."
"Situated on the fringe of a popular residential development and occupying a spacious plot, this traditional semi detached home will appeal to both first time buyers and investors. It is ideally located for Wednesfield town centre and the excellent range of facilities available at Bentley Bridg..."
"""A GENEROUSLY PROPORTIONED & WELL LAID OUT THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY WITH GOOD TRANSPORT ACCESS LINKS"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three good size bedrooms, family bathroom, lawned area, driveway & large enclosed rear garden."
"***STUNNING BRAND NEW TWO BEDROOM PARK HOME CLOSE TO LOCAL AMENITIES*** Off road parking, two double bedrooms, ensuite to master, open plan kitchen/diner, lounge. VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED!"
Affitto Estate Agents are proud to bring to the market this newley re-decorated THREE BEDROOM family home which is in the Bushbury area of Wolverhampton and is close to local amenities and with excellent transport links.
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* An excellent First floor apartment of generous proportions and a good standard of spacious and highly versatile living accommodation, which is ideal for professional or retiring persons."
""" A DECEPTIVLY SPACIOUS 3 BEDROOM FAMILY PROPERTY"" This property benifits from pleasant front and rear gardens. open plan entertainement lounge, kitchen, downstairs wc, ample storage throughout, 3 good sized bedrooms, large family bathroom."
"A Property Ready to Move Into. Set at the top of a quiet cul de sac overlooking open green areas is this two bedroom semi-detached home. Enter into the hall that leads to the lounge, stairs go to the first floor. Also on the ground floor is the open plan kitchen/dining area with door to storage ..."
"*Beautifully Presented Semi Detached Home *Three Double Bedrooms *Corner Plot *Ideal First Time Buy *Fitted Kitchen/Diner *Modern First Floor Bathroom/WC *Rear Garden *Block Paved Drive For Ample Parking
*Early Viewing Is Essential To Avoid Disappointment"
"Beautifully Presented Semi-Detached Property Ready to Move Into. Take a Look. Enter the property into the hall that leads to the light and bright lounge, spacious dining room, kitchen and downstairs cloakroom . On the first floor are two double bedrooms, one single bedroom and the family bat..."
"""AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED & WELL PROPORTIONED CHAIN FREE THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE FAMILY PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, kitchen, generously proportioned lounge, downstairs wc, three bedrooms, family bathroom, front & rear gardens."
Modern End Terrace...Three Bedrooms...Three Floors...Downstairs W.C...Open Plan Kitchen/Lounge...Low Maintenance Rear Garden...Purpose Built Shed/Outhouse...Off Road Parking...EPC Grade = B...Three Years Old...Fully Double Glazed And Gas Centrally Heated...Viewings Available Immediately...Book Now!!
"Find your ""way"" to this excellent end town house property that would indeed be the perfect first time purchase or potential down size for someone looking for a more manageable property. Situated within a pleasant cul de sac location, bordering the bustling City of Wolverhamp..."
An excellent investor opportunity. This is a well presented four bed town house located within a sought after development in the area. The property is being sold with tennants in situ.
"""A THREE BEDROOM SEMI DETACHED FAMILY PROPERTY SITUATED ON A LARGE PLOT"" Comprising entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, large entertainment kitchen, downstairs wc, side storage area, three good size bedrooms, family shower room, driveway to front & large enclosed rear garden."
"We are delighted to offer for sale this well presented 3 bed family home situated on the outskirts of Wolverhampton city centre, close to an excellent range of local amenities, excellent public transport links, local nearby park and excellent schools/college within catchment"
Modern two bed semi detached residence located within a prestigious estate in Wolverhampton. The property is situated on a choice position on the estate and simply must be viewed to appreciate the potential on offer
"A fantastic opportunity to acquire a one bedroom first floor apartment offered at 100% SHARE at £190,000 or can be offered at 50% SHARED OWNERSHIP BASIS FOR £95,000. Please enquire for further details. The apartment forms part of the McCarthy Stone Retirement Living Plus Developments "
Semi Detached Property...Three Bedrooms...Lean To With Downstairs W.C...Modern Throughout...Open Plan Kitchen Diner...Off Road Parking Via A Driveway...Low Maintenance Rear Garden And Patio...Great Location...Chain Free...EPC Grade - D...Very Spacious...Viewings Available Immediately...Book Now!!!
" Soul Estates are proud to present this well presented 3 bedroom terraced house For Sale. This perfect family home is situated in a very popular area of Wolverhampton, with good schools and amenities situated close by. The house is close to Wolverhampton College, Wolverhampton Girls' High School..."
"""A SUPERB OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A WELL PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge diner, kitchen, utility, conservatory, 3 bedrooms, family bathroom, loft area, off road parking with front and rear gardens."
"What a popular property this will be for all your eyes to see.... presenting to you is this ""one of a kind, hidden gem of a property"" a superb double fronted Victorian villa style detached residence in a delightful cul-de-sac, just South of the City and well served by a vibrant range of..."
"Beautifully presented two-bedroom semi-detached family home situated within a hugely sought after residential location of Bilston Positioned close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public trans..."
"Well presented Three-bedroom semi-detached family home situated within a hugely sought after residential location. Idyllically located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public transport a..."
"Beautifully presented three-bedroom terraced family home situated within a hugely sought after residential location of Bilston. Conveniently located close to the hugely popular Manor Academy and other essential amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, colleges, universities, and lei..."
An attractive three-bedroom end terraced property in a sought after location close to the centre of Tettenhall.
"A well maintained bungalow with a conservatory situated in a delightful and popular residential area local to a range of amenities. This pleasant two bedroom home offers versatile accommodation and benefits from central heating, double glazing, off road parking and a low maintenance rear garden...."
"A well presented three bedroomed semi detached property, occupying a quiet position with driveway and private rear garden with seating area. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, schools and local amenities. Accommodation..."
"*ATTENTION CASH BUYERS* **FOUR BEDROOM FAMILY HOME IN POPULAR LOCATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Off-road parking, garage, four bedrooms, bathroom, fitted kitchen and enclosed rear garden. Ideal investment opportunity located close to local amenities, schools and shops. CALL TO BOOK YOUR..."
"""A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A SPACIOUS THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising lounge, dining room/sitting room, fitted kitchen, ground floor bathroom, three bedrooms, upstairs wc, off road parking, front & rear gardens."
"""A RECENTLY BUILT & BEAUTIFUL PRESENTED MODERN SEMI DETACHED HOME SITUATED IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising off road parking space corner plot rear garden with entertainment decked area, breakfast kitchen, guest wc, lounge, two double bedrooms & fitted bathroom. Includes owned solar panels."
*DECEPTIVELY SPACIOUS THROUGHOUT!* *THREE DOUBLE BEDROOMS* Belvoir are delighted to be presenting to market this wonderfully presented and very sizeable three bedroom terrace home situated in a cul de sac just off Kitchen Lane!
"***OUR OPENING TIMES ARE 9AM-9PM, 7 DAYS A WEEK!*** Located in Bushbury, Wolverhampton, this immaculately presented home was brand new in 2020 and is a fantastic sized two bedroom home ideal for a first time buyer. In brief the layout comprises of, to the ground floor: a hall, a lounge/din..."
Well-presented traditional-style three-bedroom home offering spacious accommodation with double garage in the rear garden. The property has great access links to Wednesfield and Wolverhampton City Centre with bus and train links close-by. The property comprises; Two Reception Rooms. Fitted Kitche...
"A well maintained three bedroom semi-detached family home situated in an extremely popular residential area offered for sale with no upward chain. Thought to be an ideal first time purchase, this spacious residence benefits from double glazing, majority central heating, off road parking, detac..."
This wonderfully presented three bedroom semi detached property on Ashmore park is offered with no upward chain. Viewing highly recommended. EPC Rating - D
"A uniquely laid out and well presented three-bedroom town house situated in a sought after location of Bilston. This family home is idyllically positioned in the centre of Bilston close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilitie..."
"FREEHOLD AND EPC RATED C. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND B. This is an ideal first time buy or investment property for buyers looking for a property that does not need significant work. The accommodation comprises a lounge, modern kitchen/dining room, two bedrooms, bathroom /WC, a rear ga..."
***CASH BUYERS ONLY DUE TO MINESHAFT WITHIN 20 METRES OF THE PROPERTY*** Situated in a cul-de-sac location on Wayford Glade Willenhall this semi-detached property is offered with no upward chain and offers a great cash buy. The property is located in reach to the local road...
A fabulous three bed semi on the outskirts of Wolverhampton situated with a quiet Cul-de-Sac
"A delightful two bedroom bungalow situated in a popular residential area offered for sale with no upward chain. This well maintained semi-detached home benefits from central heating, double glazing, a modern shower room, fitted kitchen, off road parking and a pleasant rear garden. A range of ame..."
"Three bedroom detached family home situated on a prime corner plot at the head of a cul de sac within popular residential housing estate offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public tra..."
"FREEHOLD AND EPC AWAITED. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. This is a lovely and spacious home on a generous plot in a popular location. The accommodation comprises an entrance hall, lounge, modern kitchen / dining room. large conservatory, two double bedrooms, and a re-fitted bathroom /..."
"Stunning Two Bedroom End Of Terraced Home on a very popular estate. Comprises of Driveway, Large Rear Garden, Spacious Lounge Aswell as Close Local Amenities and Excellent nearby Transport Links, This one need to be viewed to Appreciated. Call now on to view!!!"
"Three bedroom mid terrace family home presented well throughout situated in popular residential location of Wednesfield town centre offering no upward chain. Located 2.7 miles outside of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schoo..."
"Positioned in a popular location is this deceptively spacious three double bedroom, three reception room mid terraced family home. Beautifully presented the property briefly comprises of; reception hall, stairs to first floor and access to; front living room with bay window to front aspect. Rear..."
"Three bedroom semi detached family home on a generous plot in popular area. Deceptively spacious from its initial appearance, this family dwelling boasts plenty of living space and presents a terrific family home opportunity to a variety of buyers. In brief, the house comprises; entrance hallway..."
"Well what can be said about this truly remarkable first time buyer's gem of a property! Having been a childhood and happy family home for many years for its current sellers, you can see why they have occupied and owned this property for so long, until now!! Now it’s a chance for another fam..."
"This semi detached home will appeal to first time buyers and investors. It is situated in a popular and sought after residential area and is ideally located for all essential amenities, transport links, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. The property briefly comprises, sto..."
"""A 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, large through lounge, kitchen, 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom. Externally there is an extremely large driveway to side and front and an enclosed rear garden."
"Three bedroom semi-detached family home situated on a generous plot within cul de sac of popular residential housing estate offering no upward chain. Located within 1.2 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, college..."
Fantastic Three Bedroom Semi Detached Property...Ideal For Families...Single Integral Garage...Driveway...Low Maintenance Front And Rear Gardens...Fully Double Glazed And Gas Centrally Heated...Sunroom And Downstairs W.C...Stunning Fireplace And Surround...Viewings Available Immediately...Book Now!
"If you're in the market for a well presented three bedroom home in a cul de sac location with no upward chain and vacant possession, look no further than Russell Close!"
"**INVESTORS ONLY TO PURCHASE WITH TENANT IN SITU**THREE BEDROOMS SEMI DETACHED HOUSE **WELL PRESENTED THROUGHOUT** EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OR FIRST TIME PURCHASE** Conveniently placed to Wolverhampton City Centre, this three bedroom semi-detached house offers a great investment opportunity or for a ..."
**TWO BEDROOM BUNGALOW OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Well presented 2 Bedroom semi-detached bungalow in a quiet cul-de-sac residential location within walking distance of local amenities and Bantock Park. Providing spacious accommodation with good-size lounge and fitted kitchen off with integ...
"A lovely terraced home being sold with the benefit of no upward chain. It will certainly appeal to the discerning first time buyer and also offers any price conscious investor a great opportunity to purchase a ready made buy to let property. It is ideally located for Wednesfield town centre, B..."
A luxury one bedroom top floor apartment designed for the over 60's and built to a high specification in the heart of Tettenhall Village.
"NO CHAIN! Large semi-detached home featuring three reception rooms, three double bedrooms, dining kitchen and ground floor w.c. Ideally located for access into the City Centre and University as well as a range of local shops and renowned schools."
"A deceptively spacious property being conveniently situated on a popular residential development. It is ideally located for all essential amenities, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. This property offers first time buyers a golden opportunity to take their first step onto..."
"A modern end terrace property located on a newly built estate off the popular Gatis Street is located conveniently to the City Centre and the road networks found thereafter. Thought ideal for a first time buyer the property enjoys an entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, 2 bedrooms, bathroom, gas centr..."
"""A STYLISHLY PRESENTED 3 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance hall, large open plan kitchen diner, utility, downstairs wc, 3 generous bedrooms and a family bathroom."
**THREE-BEDROOM HOME OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN IN POPULAR LOCATION NOW AVAILABLE** An ideal first-time purchase located close to local amenities including schools and shops and having access links to walks along Smestow Valley and Staffordshire and Worcestershire Canal. Having a large lawn ...
"CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION - NO UPPER CHAIN - GARAGE & DRIVEWAY - FRONT & REAR GARDENS - A two bedroom semi-detached bungalow in a quiet cul-de-sac in the popular Bradmore area. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge, two bedrooms, kitchen and bathroom. Additional benefits include; front ..."
"""A MODERN END-TERRACED PROPERTY SITUATED ON A POPULAR DEVELOPMENT"" Externally this property has pleasant front and rear gardens with off road parking. Internally there is a ground floor guest wc, lounge with adjoining fitted kitchen, 2 double bedrooms and a fitted family bathroom."
"Situated in a popular residential area in Penn and most convenient for the majority of amenities, 15 The Gallery occupies a ground floor position on this small exclusive development of luxury apartments which has been constructed to a superior specification, offering the upmost in luxury accommodati"
"A well presented end terrace property is set on an established road and located conveniently to the City centre and the vibrant Tettenhall Green is thought ideal for a first time purchase. Set over 3 floors the accommodation briefly includes 2 reception rooms, kitchen, bathroom, 2 double bedroom..."
"A pleasant two bedroom bungalow extended to the rear and offered for sale with no upward chain. This semi-detached property is situated in a popular residential area and benefits from central heating, double glazing and off road parking. The property requires some modernisation works but offers ..."
"CHAIN FREE!!! Located in a most sought after area, is this deceptively spacious two bedroom, semi-detached Bungalow. The property appears to be in good condition and well maintained throughout. The Bungalow briefly comprises of: Lounge with bay window to front aspect, two bedrooms, with the la..."
"""A CHAIN FREE 4 BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED HOME WITH DETACHED GARAGE TO SIDE"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, downstairs wc, conservatory, 4 bedrooms and a family bathroom. Detached garage to side, off road parking, front and rear gardens."
** Huge Potential for Renovation! ** ** Perfect for Family or Investor! **This wonderful three bedroom property is offered with no upward chain and would make a wonderful project for any family or investor!
"This ideal first home is situated on a popular residential development and is ideally located for all essential amenities, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge retail park. The deceptively spacious accommodation briefly comprises, storm porch, reception hall, living room, conservatory, t..."
*NO UPWARD CHAIN* Chanterelle Court is a most attractive and imposing development of just fourteen individual executive apartments constructed by Bellway Homes in 2005 to a high specification.
"A superb and luxuriously appointed third floor apartment set in this striking conversion of a 19th Century Flour Mill. The apartment has retained many original features and consists of an open plan living/dining room and kitchen, family bathroom and double bedroom. Externally there is secure gate..."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Well Presented Semi Detached Ho...
**EXTENSIVELY MODERNSIED AND RENOVATED THROUGHOUT** THREE WELL PROPORTIONED BEDROOMS** MODERN REFITTED KITCHEN AND GROUND FLOOR REFITTED BATHROOM**EXCELLENT FAMILY/FIRST TIME PURCHASE**WALKING DISTANCE TO BILSTON TOWN CENTRE** An absolute pleasure to bring to market is this rece...
***LAND FOR SALE WITH PLANNING PERMISSION*** A fantastic development opportunity to purchase land previously used as garages on the popular Ashmore Park estate with planning permission for the erection of a pair of semi detached houses. For further details please contact Redstones or check with ...
"This semi detached property although in need of some updating is the Ideal first home or investment opportunity. It is ideally located for all essential amenities, Wednesfield town centre and Bentley Bridge Retail park. The deceptively spacious accommodation briefly comprises, hall, dining kit..."
"""A CHAIN FREE WELL PRESENTED LUXURY TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT WITH SECURE GATED ENTRANCE"" Comprising of entrance hall, kitchen/lounge, bathroom, two bedrooms & en-suite. Externally there are delightful communal gardens as well as allocated parking spaces with secure key fob entry."
"Purplebricks are pleased to offer for sale this detached bungalow set on a corner plot comprising of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, w/c, two bedrooms and a family bathroom.
The property benefits further from having gas central heating and double glazing.
Externally you have off road parking and ..."
"CHAIN FREE!!! Located in a most popular area, is this three bedroom semi-detached family home. Benefitting from a good sized lounge, kitchen/diner, good sized rear garden, Utility room, three good sized bedrooms and a family bathroom. The property is in need of modernisation, which has been re..."
Traditional Mid Terrace Property...Three Excellent Bedrooms...Downstairs Family Bathroom...Upstairs En-Suite W.C...Brand New Boiler...Picturesque Yet Low Maintenance Rear Garden...EPC Grade = E...Twenty Yards From The Tettenhall Road...Two Reception Rooms...Viewings Available Immediately...Book Now!
"Two bedroom end terrace house situated in popular residential location offering no upward chain. Located 3.7 mile from Wolverhampton city centre, the property is close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as the i54 & McArt..."
****EPC RATING AWAITED****TWO BEDROOM MID TERRACED RESIDENCE****REAR LIVING ROOM OVERLOOKING GARDEN****FITTED KITCHEN****ENTRANCE HALL***BATHROOM TO FIRST FLOOR****DOUBLE GLAZING WHERE STATED****GAS CENTRAL HEATING SYSTEM****REAR GARDEN HAVING GATED REAR ACCESS****DRIVEWAY****COUNCIL TAX BAND B
*JOIN US FOR AFTERNOON TEA - WEDNESDAY 19th APRIL- 10am - 4pm - BOOK YOUR PLACE TODAY!* **EXPECT TO BE IMPRESSED** by this extremely desirable and LARGER THAN AVERAGE sized apartment for the development. Located on the TOP FLOOR having LIFT ACCESS TO ALL FLOORS with JULIETTE BALCONY and...
A beautifully presented first floor apartment with views over Bantock Park
"""A QUAINT AND CHARACTERFUL 2 BEDROOM END TERRACED PROPERTY"" Comprising of lounge, kitchen, 2 bedrooms, family bathroom. Externally there is a gravelled driveway with shared side access, shared rear garden."
GetAnOffer are offering this ATTRACTIVELY PRICED PROPERTY from a MOTIVATED seller to buyers that are in a position to purchase relatively quickly. This property has been PRICED to ENCOURAGE a QUICK SALE. GetAnOffer are pleased to offer this property for sale: Semi Detached House with Entran...
This property is being sold through our Advanced sales method to provide complete transparency and security for all parties involved. A vacant freehold three bedroom property.
"Offered with no upward chain a two bedroomed terraced property, occupying a quiet position with private rear garden. The property is ideally situated in a popular location with convenient access to transport links, such as the m54, schools and local amenities. Accommodation comprises;
To the ..."
"* A spacious 3-bedroom end-terrace house in an excellent residential position, very convenient for local primary schools. With two individual reception spaces, a breakfast kitchen, and driveway parking * Hall * Lounge * Living and dining room with patio doors * Breakfast kitchen * Three bedrooms ..."
"""A PERFECT FIRST TIME PURCHASE OR POTENTIAL BUY TO LET INVESTMENT"" This 3 bedrooms mid-terraced property comprises of entrance hall, lounge kitchen, downstairs shower room, 3 bedrooms, driveway to front and an enclosed rear garden."
"A spacious three bedroomed end of Terraced property, occupying a quiet position with private rear garden. The property is ideally situated in a sought after and popular area, with convenient access to transport links, schools and local amenities. Accommodation comprises;
To the ground floor; E..."
"""A CHAIN FREE PLEASANTLY PRESENTED GROUND FLOOR LUXURY FLAT WITH SECURITY ENTRANCE SYSTEM"" Comprising 19ft entertainment lounge diner, kitchen, two spacious bedrooms, master en-suite, bathroom & parking to rear."
"Haart Estate Agents are proud to present this deceptively large two bed family residence situated within a popular and desirable residential area. Considerable front and rear garden spaces, this home is ideal for the first time buyer or investor alike"
"G&T Properties are delighted to offer this Extended, BAY FRONTED 2 Bed Bungalow offering a SPACIOUS Home complete with LARGE DRIVEWAY, TWO reception rooms, Side GARAGE and PRIVATE Rear Garden. The Property is in a popular residential area with an abundance of QUALITY Local Schools, close to all loca"
"CASH BUYERS ONLY. Exciting news! A 3 bedroom semi-detached home on Durberville Road in Wolverhampton is now available. With a spacious garden, private driveway, and potential for personal touches, this home is perfect for families or investors looking to make it their own. Don'..."
"Dixons Willenhall are delighted to offer this three bed traditional semi- detached home, located in a popular area of Willenhall. This property will be sold with NO CHAIN and may be in need of some modernisation, but in brief compromises a lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms ..."
"""FANTASTIC 2 BEDROOM MODERN MID-TERRACED PROPERTY"" Comprising of entrance hall, modern fitted kitchen, large open plan lounge, downstairs wc, 2 good sized bedrooms and a family bathroom. Off road parking to front with an enclosed rear garden."
"Situated in an established residential area located just off Gloucester Street and convenient for easy access to the city centre, this deceptive terraced house has been thoughtfully extended over the years to create a well-appointed family house."
"Two bedroom end terrace house presented well throughout situated in popular residential area offering no upward chain. Located within 2.8 mile of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with..."
" **TWO BEDROOM DETACHED BUNGALOW IN NEED OF MODERNISATION** has gas radiator central heating and briefly comprises of reception hall, lounge, kitchen, shower room, front and rear gardens, tandem garage and driveway "
"Haart Estate Agents are proud to present this deceptively large two bed modern family residence situated within a popular and desirable residential area. Considerable front and rear garden spaces, this home is ideal for the first time buyer or investor alike"
"A beautifully presented spacious traditional family home. Enter the property into the front lounge with feature fireplace, that leads to the dining/reception room two with kitchen and bathroom downstairs. On the first floor are two good sized bedrooms with stairs up to the loft area which can be..."
"A purpose built modern development of apartments from Mcarthy & Stone, for those from 60 years of age, and with all the usual amenities as standard for Mcarthy & Stone and a wealth of surrounding amenities, shops and services within the local and sought after are of Penn, just south of..."
"*** ATTENTION FIRST TIME BUYERS*** Hadleigh Estate Agents are pleased to offer this delightful one bedroom apartment finished to the highest specification. Located in the heart of Wolverhampton close to all local amenities including shops, restaurants, places of education and worship, Wo..."
"An extended semi-detached family home with no upward chain offered for sale by way of THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. This three bedroom residence is situated in an extremely popular residential area and although the property requires some updating works, there is enormous potential on offer. Inter..."
"""A CHAIN FREE FOUR BEDROOM MAISONETTE STYLE HOUSE BENEFITING FROM A LONG LEASE"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, modern fitted kitchen, four bedrooms, family bathroom, separate wc, generously proportioned rear garden & side courtyard style area."
"We are proud to offer this One Bedroom Retirement Flat for Over 60's – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.*Guide Price £150,000 - £170,000*"
"FREEHOLD. EPC RATED C. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. This is a traditional terraced home, just off the Dudley Road, and moments away from a host of shops and businesses, and close to local schools. The accommodation comprises two reception rooms, opened up into one room, a kitchen, ba..."
"NO UPWARD CHAIN - This well presented two bedroom property is conveniently located within walking distance to Wednesfield town centre. There is a well planned kitchen, lounge, two good sized bedrooms and a modern shower room with lovely rear garden. The property also benefits from a downstairs c..."
"FOR SALE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION.FREEHOLD AND EPC AWAITED. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. EPC RATED D. This a deceptively large home, a former H.M.O, which is now in need of comprehensive improvement and has an entrance porch and hallway, two receptions, large kitchen/ living r..."
"""POTENTIAL INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY"" THREE BEDROOM SEMI-DETACHED PROPERTY IN A POPULAR CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, ground floor shower room, 3 bedrooms, large concrete off road parking to front and an enclosed rear garden."
"""INVESTMENT OR FAMILY HOME! - THIS HIGHLY DECEPTIVE THREE STOREY TOWN HOUSE IS CONVENIENTLY LOCATED FOR WEDNESFIELD SHOPPING CENTRES & NEW CROSS HOSPITAL"" Comprising off road parking, garage (ideal for conversion), lounge, open plan kitchen diner, wc, three bedrooms, bathroom & rear garden."
"A spacious two bedroom first floor apartment that is well presented throughout and situated within a popular location close to New Cross Hospital, Bentley Bridge retail park and Wolverhampton City Centre. Viewing is highly recommended to appreciate the accommodation on offer."
"""ATTENTION INVESTORS! - A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A THREE/FOUR BEDROOM MID TERRACE PROPERTY"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge/Bedroom Four, sitting/dining room, kitchen, ground floor bathroom, three bedrooms & rear garden."
"A STUNNING 2-BEDROOM APARTMENT LOCATED IN THE SOUGHT-AFTER LOCATION OF WOLVERHAMPTON WITH GREAT VIEWS. The apartment benefits from being very bright and airy with DUAL ASPECT WINDOWS and within close proximity to Wolverhampton's town centre's amenities, transport links, schools, and more. Wolver..."
"*EXTENDED 999 YEAR LEASE* A particularly well presented modern ground floor apartment having been substantially improved upon the years, provides an excellent standard of surprisingly spacious and comfortable living accommodation, which is ideal for the first time buyer or for professional persons."
New to the market is this amazing two-bedroom apartment situated in the sought-after area of Wolverhampton This property is like no other with the characterful features and sense of community as you drive up to the property.
"Situated within the established and popular residential area of Tettenhall, the property forms part of the highly popular ‘The Old Manor' development, which is made up of similar style properties set in delightfully mature communal grounds, offering most pleasing outlooks and overall living envir..."
Royston and Lund are pleased to present a three bedroom mid terrace house located in Wolverhampton and sold with no upward chain. This property benefits from being located near Wolverhampton city centre and is near multiple public transport links. In brief the property comprise of a sp...
"Guide Price = £138,000 - £148,000 Freehold Vacant Extended and Refurbished Semi Detached House Property for auction on 29th March at 13:00 at Avery Fields, 79 Sandon Rd, Birmingham B17 8DT - Public Auction including Live Stream & Telephone Bidding."
A two-bedroom ground floor apartment standing in an elevated and convenient position only a short distance from Compton shops (WOMBOURNE OFFICE)
"Deceptively spacious three bed family home located within a quiet cul-de-sac street in Wolverhampton. The property has been maintained to a high standard, has excellent transport links and lies within a good catchment area for local schools. Viewing Highly Advised!"
"A recently refurbished two bedroom semi detached bungalow offered for sale by way of THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION, benefitting from double glazing, majority central heating, off road parking and a good size rear garden.Situated in a popular residential area close to a range of amenities, this ple..."
"An excellent two-bedroom ground floor apartment being part of a ‘retirement’ development, specifically for those aged over 60 years of age, and situated in one of the premier residential areas of Tettenhall, to the Western fringe of Wolverhampton and its extensive range of shopping..."
"**TWO BEDROOM EXECUTIVE APARTMENT WITH ELECTRIC GATED ENTRANCE, OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Stylish and modern executive two-bedroom apartment finished to a very high standard with a wrap-around balcony off the Living Room giving a feeling of space and brightness. Situated close to local am..."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* A well presented modern first floor apartment having the benefit of gas fired warm air heating and upvc double glazed windows and provides a good standard of surprisingly spacious and comfortable living accommodation, which is ideal for professional or retiring persons."
"**NO CHAIN & RECENTLY MODERNISED **TWO BEDROOMS**REFITTED FIRST FLOOR BATHROOM** EXCELLENT INVESTMENT OR FIRST TIME PURCHASE** Conveniently placed to Wolverhampton City Centre, this two bedroom end terrace house offers a great investment opportunity or for a home hunter alike! Si..."
"* NO UPWARD CHAIN*
Attention buyers, a fantastic opportunity to acquire this well proportioned three bed house within walking distance to the City Centre"
"Ideal for First Time Buyers and Investment Buyers, This Three Bedroom Mid Terraced Home comes with; Two Reception Rooms, Three bedrooms, Upstairs Bathroom and Off Street Parking. This property has Excellent Transport links and local amenities. Call now on to View!!!"
* AVAILALBE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION - END DATE FOR THE AUCTION 11/11/22 AT 12:30 * LARGE DRIVEWAY PARKING * GOOD SIZE REAR GARDEN * TWO DOUBLE BEDROOMS * EPC RATING D * FREEHOLD *
"""A CHAIN FREE PURPOSE BUILT GROUND FLOOR 2 BEDROOM APARTMENT"" Comprising of entrance hall, lounge, kitchen 2 bedrooms and a family bathroom. Externally there is garden to front, Juliet balcony leading to rear overlooking the car park with an allocated parking space."
"Being Sold by YOPA Online Auction. Starting Bids from £140,000 Buy it now option available
Please call or visit YOPA Online Auctions for more information"
"""A CHAIN FREE ONE BEDROOM MEWS STYLE HOUSE SITUATED IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising large open plan lounge, kitchen, inner entrance hall, downstairs bathroom, large upper level bedroom. Externally there is an allocated parking space and a delightful enclosed rear garden"
New to the market is this amazing three-bedroom property situated in the heart of Wolverhampton. This property is like no other with the characterful features and sense of community as you drive up to the property. 
"""A 3 BEDROOM MID-TERRACED PROPERTY BENEFITING FROM NO UPWARD CHAIN"" Comprising of entrance hall, good sized lounge, kitchen, downstairs wc, 3 good sized bedrooms, family bathroom."
"This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with the Auctioneer, iamsold Limited This method of auction requires both parties to complete the transaction within 56 days of the draft contract for sale bei..."
"""A THREE BEDROOM MID TERRACE PROPERTY CLOSE TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, dining room, kitchen, family bathroom, three bedrooms, & enclosed rear garden."
"*999 YEAR LEASE* Bewick Court is a most attractive and imposing development of twenty three individual executive apartments constructed by Redrow Homes in 2002 to a high specification. Number five Bewick Court resides in an enviable top floor position within the development, offering an excel..."
"City of Wolverhampton Council Situated on Beckett Street, close to local shopping facilities and the amenities available in Wolverhampton City Centre including Wolverhampton Train Station. A Terrace House requiring modernisation with accommodation arranged on Two Floors comprising: First..."
"NO CHAIN - Cash buyers are sought for this spacious semi-detached family home which is of Non Standard Construction. Requiring general updating the property offers tremendous living and letting potential being within easy reach of local shops, public transport and Highfields School. Driveway for ..."
"**TWO-BEDROOM TOP FLOOR APARTMENT WITH ENSUITE TO MASTER BEDROOM** Located close to local amenities including schools and shops and a short drive to motorway links via the M54. Having allocated parking space behind gated access, the property comprises; Large living room with Kitchen area. Two ..."
"NO CHAIN - Very well presented second floor apartment in an established retirement development conveniently located for Tettenhall village and Upper Green. Set within beautifully maintained grounds the property has resident and visitor parking, lift access and generous accommodation comprising ha..."
A well maintained end terraced property offered for sale by way of The Modern Method of Auction and with no upward chain. This pleasant three bedroom family home is situated in a popular residential area local to a range of amenities and providing easy access onto Birmingham New Road/A4123 ideal ...
"******* FOR BUY TO LET LANDLORDS ONLY ******* Three-bedroom mid terrace family home in a hugely popular residential location. Located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public t..."
"A well located, spacious, ground floor flat standing within a sought after area with the additional benefit of a period Coach House with conversion potential (STPP). CASH BUYERS ONLY"
"**FOR SALE VIA MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION**THREE BEDROOMS***CALL FOR MORE INFORMATION** This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with theAuctioneer, iamsold Limited.This method of auction requires both ..."
"MODERN TOP FLOOR PENTHOUSE APARTMENT SET BEHIND SECURE GATED ENTRY WITH A FEATURE CORNER SEATING BALCONY TO RELAX ON AND ENJOY WATCHING THE WORLD GO BY! CONVENIENTLY PLACED TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE AND ROAD NETWORK LINKS, THIS IS AN APARTMENT NOT TO BE MISSED.. What an e..."
"PERFECT INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY, offers a Tenant-in-situ, This stunning Two Bedrooms Ground Floor Plat is being offered with allocated parking. This Highly sorted after estate is extremely popular are sure to be snapped up. Call now on to view."
"** Fantastic Investment Opportunity! ** ** Perfect BTL! **Investors at the ready, because Belvoir is offering another fantastic opportunity. Don't let that money eat a hole in your pocket, instead invest in this wonderful two bedroom semi-detached home. This fabulous propert..."
" **ONE BEDROOM GALLERIED BUNGALOW** situated on the popular Hadley Heath Estate close to local schools and amenities. Lounge with stairs leading to bedroom, fitted kitchen and ground floor bathroom. Off road parking and front and side garden. Ideal for first time buyers. CALL OUR WILLENHALL OFF..."
"MODERN APARTMENT SET BEHIND SECURE GATED ENTRY, CONVENIENTLY PLACED TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE AND ROAD NETWORK LINKS! Perfect for young professionals who are looking for their first home or even ideal for the discerning investor! Located in the heart of Wolverhampton, having e..."
"**CASH OFFERS ONLY - TWO BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT IN POPULAR LOCATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Balcony, en-suite to master bedroom, lounge currently used as a third bedroom, fitted kitchen, ideal first time purchase, allocated parking. VIEWING HIGHLY RECOMMENDED, CALL TO ARRANGE YOUR ..."
"Two bedroom ground floor flat situated in immensely sought after residential location offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as the i54 & McArthur Glen designer outlet. Public transport..."
"""AN EXCELLENT OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A THREE BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising dining room, lounge, fitted kitchen, ground floor bathroom, three bedrooms, separate wc, front & rear gardens."
"""AN IMPRESSIVE WELL PROPORTIONED ONE BEDROOM UPPER FLOOR APARTMENT OFFERING SPACIOUS LIVING ACCOMMODATION & COMES TO THE MARKET WITH NO CHAIN"" Comprising communal entrance, hall, generous open plan lounge kitchen, cloak room, one bedroom with balcony, en suite, allocated parking, communal gard..."
MODERN TWO BEDROOM LARGE GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT CONVENIENTLY LOCATED CLOSE TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE AND WITHIN WALKING DISTANCE TO WOLVERHAMPTON RAIL STATION. Preferably sold with Long term Tenants in situ paying £750 per calendar month or first time buyers seeking ground fl...
Spacious Ground Floor Flat...Two Double Bedrooms...Quiet Cul-De-Sac Location...Large Lounge With Feature Fire Surround...Modern Bathroom...Low Maintenance Rear Garden...Plenty Of Storage Options...Leasehold Property...Awaiting EPC...Viewings Available Immediately...Council Tax Band - A...Book Now!!!
"A TWO BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT SITUATED ON THE FIRST FLOOR Beechwood Court, a McCarthy & Stone Development, is for those wanting to retire to an area with local amenities. It is a condition of purchase that residents be over the age of 60 years although for couples one can be over 55 ye..."
"A mid terraced property with no upward chain offering two double bedrooms, living room, kitchen/diner, utility area, first floor bathroom and a good size rear garden. The property is local to a range of amenities including shops, schools and public transport services close to hand, and is with..."
NO UPWARD CHAIN. Occupying a first floor position within a small secure gated complex this deceptively spacious one bedroom apartment enjoys a pleasant aspect from principle rooms and has been well maintained over the years to provide an appealing standard of living accommodation and is thought ...
"ATTENTION INVESTORS - SUPERB READY MADE INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY! Very well presented terrace home with two living rooms, good size kitchen, two double bedrooms and first floor bathroom. Let on a 3 year contract from 1st February 2022 at £650pcm."
"A First floor two-bedroom apartment set within a modern complex with convenient access to Bilston centre, which has an abundance of local shops and also the Black Country route is thought ideal for a first time buyer or a potential investor. The accommodation briefly includes an entrance hal..."
"* Open House Saturday 8th between 13:00 - 15:00 - Call to register your interest. By appointment only*  This is a traditional-style terrace home situated in the All Saints area of Wolverhampton. On the ground floor, the accommodation briefly comprises lounge, sitting room/dining room, kit..."
Belvoir are delighted to be presenting to market this wonderful and immaculately kept fourth floor apartment with lift access in the ever popular Broad Gauge Way development first constructed by Barratt Homes in 2008.The home is being sold with no upward chain and vacant possession whil...
"Newly refurbished two bedroom mid terrace house situated in cul de sac location of residential location near city centre offering no upward chain. Property is offered for sale through the Modern Method of Auction which is operated by iamsold Limited. Should you view, offer or bid your data w..."
"""A CHAIN FREE TRADITIONAL SEMI DETACHED HOME SITUATED IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATED FOR LOCAL SHOPPING, NEW CROSS HOSPITAL & BENTLEY BRIDGE RETAIL PARK"" Comprising front & rear garden, off road parking, garage, lounge, dining room, kitchen, three bedrooms & shower room."
"Spacious Two Bedroom First Floor Apartment on a popular estate being offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN. comprising of Kitchen-Diner, Bathroom. Two Bedrooms, Allocated Parking Space. Viewings high recommended to be appreciated... Call now on to view!!!"
"A TWO BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR RETIREMENT APARTMENT OVERLOOKING THE FRONT OF THE DEVELOPMENT Pendene Court is situated within a short distance of local shops, Doctors surgeries and with access to local bus routes via bus stop near to development. Constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) L..."
"IDEAL BUY-TO-LET INVESTMENT - SECURE PARKING - EN-SUITE TO MASTER - LOUNGE/DINING ROOM - IMMACULATE CONDITION - A fantastic two bedroom, second floor apartment on the edge of this modern development - The property comprises; communal entrance, entrance hall, a large lounge/dining room, modern fit..."
"""A CHAIN FREE TWO BEDROOM WELL PRESENTED APARTMENT"" Comprising communal entrance hall, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, two bedrooms, en-suite, bathroom, allocated parking space & communal grounds"
"""CHAIN FREE - A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A WELL PRESENTED TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT"" Comprising communal entrance, entrance hall, open plan lounge kitchen, two bedrooms, master en-suite, bathroom, allocated parking space & well maintained grounds."
""" INVESTMENT OPPURTUNITY"" This 3 bedroom mid-terraced property is located close to Wolverhampton city centre. Internally this property has 3 bedrooms, 2 reception rooms, kitchen, bathroom. Externally there is a small paved courtyard to front, small paved courtyard to the rear, side gated access."
*NO UPWARD CHAIN* The development known as Holloway Court is a most attractive and imposing development of sixteen individual apartments constructed by David Wilson Homes in 2001.
"An Ideal Investment Opportunity or First Home - Take a Look. Enter the property into the hall that leads to the lounge, reception room 2/dining room. towards the rear of the property is the galley kitchen and downstairs shower room. On the first floor are two double bedrooms and a single bedroom..."
"CHAIN FREE!!!
Tucked away at the end of a leafy close is this beautifully presented and deceptively spacious modern, two bedroom upper floor apartment. Of all the apartments on this new build estate, this is probably the best location! The property briefly comprises of; Secure communal intercom ..."
"""A DELIGHTFUL SURPRISINGLY SPACIOUS TWO BEDROOM APARTMENT SITUATED IN A POPULAR LOCATION!"" Comprising - communal entrance, entrance hall, lounge, fitted kitchen, two bedrooms, family bathroom, allocated parking, well presented communal gardens."
"This is a perfect example of surprisingly spacious and low maintenance living accommodation, but not only that... this is a TWO BEDROOM HIGHER FLOOR apartment for that added security that is situated in the heart of Wolverhampton City, appealing for those that may need the benefits to take a shor..."
"""A 2 BEDROOM TOP FLOOR CITY CENTRE APARTMENT"" Comprising of communal entrance hall, entrance hall, large open plan lounge leading to kitchen, two bedrooms one of which is en-suite, bathroom. Externally there are communal gardens and 1 allocated parking space."
"Two-bedroom terrace family home situated within a sought after residential location offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public transport available via bus,..."
"Three-bedroom mid terrace family home in need of some updating in a hugely popular residential location. Located close to amenities, including; shops, supermarkets, schools, colleges, universities, and leisure facilities. Further benefiting from public transport available via bus, rail and t..."
A well presented ground floor one bedroom flat with the benefit of a driveway to the front and garden to the rear. NO UPWARD CHAIN
"Beautifully presented and deceptively spacious modern, two bedroom ground floor apartment. Just off the Stafford Road and close to the i54 and M54 motorway"
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN*This is a modern purpose built ground floor apartment situated within an established, sought after location while so handily placed for a comprehensive range of amenities and transport links within walking distance"
"FREEHOLD. EPC RATED C. WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. FOR SALE BY THE MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION. Modern-style family home in the New Park Village area. The accommodation comprises and entrance porch and hall, store, downstairs WC, lounge, kitchen, three bedrooms, and a bathroom / WC. Externally..."
"*FANTASTIC INVESTMENT OPPORTUNITY OR FIRST HOME* Whitegates have immense pleasure in offering FOR SALE this TOP FLOOR TWO BEDROOM apartment on ALBION STREET, WOLVERHAMPTON. This property is located within walking distance to the Wolverhampton Town Centre, Bus/Train/Metro Station and y..."
"Two bedroom mid terrace house recently refurbished throughout situated in popular residential location offering no upward chain. Located within 2.2 miles of Wolverhampton city centre, this home retreat is close to all sorts of amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facili..."
"""A DELIGHTFUL TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT IN A CUL-DE-SAC LOCATION"" Comprising lounge, kitchen, two double bedrooms, bathroom, garage & communal parking."
GROUND FLOOR Having been updated and modernised in 2018 to a high standard this ground floor McCarthy and Stone apartment is set in the ever sought after over 55's development of Beechwood Court which is located in between the convenient areas of Tettenhall Green and Tettenhall Wood with both ...
"""A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE THIS SURPRISINGLY SPACIOUS 2 BEDROOM FAMILY HOME"" Comprising of entrance porch, entrance hall, lounge, dining room, fitted kitchen, 2 bedrooms, bathroom, separate wc, front and rear gardens."
"Situated on the ground floor with the convenience of direct entry, this lovely apartment offers generous proportions, gas and central heating and double glazing with allocated and gated parking to the rear."
"**TWO BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT ON POPULAR MCCARTHY & STONE DEVELOPMENT, OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** Located in a private location overlooking lawn gardens and within easy reach of Tettenhall's village centre, the property benefits from, two double bedrooms, a large lounge with..."
"""A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A SPACIOUS 2 BEDROOM TOP FLOOR APARTMENT"" Comprising of communal entrance, lounge, fitted kitchen, 2 bedrooms, family bathroom, communal grounds and separate garage."
"""A 3 BEDROOM MID-TERRACED PROPERTY CONVENIENTLY LOCATED FOR ACCESS TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE AND FURTHER AFIELD"" Comprising of lounge, dining room, kitchen, 3 bedrooms, family bathroom, front courtyard style garden, enclosed rear garden."
"For Sale By Public Auction 30 March 2023 A Freehold Semi Detached Investment Property Current Gross Income: £7,500 pa"
"NO UPPER CHAIN - IDEAL BUY-TO-LET - 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS - 2 RECEPTION ROOMS - A two bedroom terraced property in the Dunstall area within easy reach of the City centre and amenities - an ideal buy-to-let purchase. Accommodation comprises; entrance into lounge, dining room, kitchen, ground floor bat..."
"Do you need help selling your property? Do you need help finding the right mortgage? Do you have a property to let? Here at Paul Dubberley and Co Willenhall we offer free advice on the house buying, selling and letting process. Contact us on "
"Positioned in a popular location is this well presented one bedroom, purpose built flat.
Being offered CHAIN FREE! This property offers great opportunity for the first time buyer to get on the property ladder. With low ground rent and maintenance costs, this property offers great potential. Spac..."
"Traditional two bedroom mid terrace house situated within residential location available to buy to let investors. This freehold residence is a ready made home with a tenant currently in situ paying £500 rent per calendar month presenting a yield of 5.4%. In brief, the property compris..."
"""A BEAUTIFULLY PRESENTED & CHAIN FREE FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT CONVENIENTLY LOCATED FOR WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE"" Comprising communal security entry, 19ft lounge, refitted kitchen, two double bedrooms, fitted shower room & COMMUNAL LAUNDRY AREAS TO REAR"
"Calling All First Time Buyers or Investors - A Well Presented Flat Ready to Move Into. Enter this first floor flat into a spacious hallway that leads to the light and bright lounge, two double bedrooms a well equipped kitchen and a modern bathroom. There are two enclosed balcony rooms which can ..."
"* A good-sized 2-bedroom, first-floor retirement apartment on a quiet development just a short walk from picturesque Upper Green. With allocated parking and delightful communal gardens * Hall * Kitchen * Spacious lounge * Two bedrooms * Bathroom * Allocated parking * Outdoor store * Fully maintai..."
"CHAIN FREE
Two bedroom ground floor apartment, with spacious lounge/dining/kitchen. Master bedroom with en-suite shower room, 3pc bathroom suite, allocated parking in a secure gated parking area located to the rear of the property situated amongst the communal gardens. Secure door entry system in..."
"Situated in a popular and established residential area, this traditional first floor maisonette is offered to the market with no upward chain and is conveniently situated to a host of local amenities including an excellent range of shops, schools and public transport services. The properties acc..."
"""AN IMMACULATELY PRESENTED ONE BEDROOM TOP FLOOR FLAT OVERLOOKING BANTOCK PARK"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, bedroom, bathroom & garage"
"FIRST-FLOOR MODERN APARTMENT. LEASEHOLD WITH 105 YEARS REMAINING. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND B. EPC RATED C. Ground rent £100 p.a Service charges £1011.26 p.a. Offered with no upward chain, the accommodation comprises an entrance hall, large living room / kitchen, bedroom..."
""" A TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR APARTMENT CLOSE TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE"" Comprising of entrance hall, two bedrooms, large open lounge/ diner, kitchen and family bathroom, communal walk ways as well as communal gardens."
"A well located, spacious, one bedroom flat within a sought after area which would benefit from some upgrading."
"""CASH OFFERS INVITED - A THREE/FOUR BEDROOM MID TERRACE FAMILY PROPERTY CONVENIENTLY LOCATED CLOSE TO TRANSPORT ACCESS LINKS"" Comprising hall, lounge, dining area, good size kitchen, additional room (potential Bedroom STPP), en-suite shower room, three bedrooms, bathroom, front & rear gardens."
"""A CHAIN FREE TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR FLAT CLOSE TO POPULAR TRANSPORT LINKS"" Comprising communal entrance hall, entrance hall, 17ft lounge, modern fitted kitchen. two bedrooms & bathroom. Externally there are communal gardens to front and rear."
"A prominently positioned first-floor apartment in a highly favoured retirement complex within a particularly pleasant setting with amenities within walking distance to Tettenhall village and Tettenhall Wood. Neatly presented accommodation, very comfortably appointed and offering independent lifes..."
"A First floor two-bedroom apartment set within a modern complex with convenient access to Bilston centre, which has an abundance of local shops and also the Black Country route is thought ideal for a first time buyer or a potential investor. The accommodation briefly includes an entrance hall, 'o..."
"A ground floor two-bedroom apartment set within a modern complex with convenient access to Bilston centre, which has an abundance of local shops and also the Black Country route is thought ideal for a first time buyer or a potential investor. The accommodation briefly includes an entrance ha..."
Wonderful opportunity to acquire a ground floor apartment. This property has been freshly renovated throughout and offers a recently installed boiler and electric heating.This Independent Living apartment is for 60+ years and partners can be 50+ years . Call now on to view...
"BUY TO LET INVESTORS ONLY – SOLD WITH TENANTS IN SITU, Tenure – Freehold, EPC Rating – D (Potential - C), Rental Income - £450 pcm, Yield - , Council Tax Band - A, Rental Details to Follow**, Tenant in Situ Since - , Contract Type - , Contract Remaining - , Buyer’s Reservation Fee Applicable."
"ATTENTION INVESTORS! City centre apartment currently let on a 3 year tenancy at £525 pcm. Allocated parking, living room with kitchen off, double bedroom and bathroom. City centre location with exciting developments proposed nearby."
"Spacious Two Bedroom First Floor Apartment on a popular estate being offered with NO UPWARD CHAIN. Having a open plan Living area, Bathroom. Two Bedrooms, (master with en suite), Allocated Parking Space. Viewings highly recommended!"
"*NO CHAIN* Spacious two bedroom apartment situated in a convenient yet quiet location close to the town centre. The apartment property comprises modern fitted kitchen, spacious lounge with laminate flooring, two good sized bedrooms and bathroom with electric shower over bath, all with neutral dec..."
"A First floor one bedroom apartment set within a modern complex with convenient access to Bilston centre, which has an abundance of local shops and also the Black Country route is thought ideal for a first time buyer or a potential investor. The accommodation briefly includes an entrance hall, lo..."
"One bedroom first floor maisonette recently refurbished throughout, situated in popular residential location offering no upward chain. This leasehold residence offers a ready-made home solution for a multitude of buyers, with rare views across the adjacent park and boasts scenic walking rou..."
"One bedroom ground floor maisonette recently refurbished throughout situated in sought after residential housing offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport available via bu..."
"Two bedroom mid terrace house presented well throughout situated in residential location offering no upward chain. This freehold residence presents a ready-made home solution suitable for a variety of buyers. In brief, the accommodation comprises; entrance hallway, dining room current..."
"A freehold site of approx. 6,835sq ft/ 635sq meters in the popular residential area of Wolverhampton just off the Stafford Road with Planning Permission granted for the construction of a detached two bedroom bungalow with a floor area of approx. 66.84sq metres/719.4sq feet."
"Live stream auction on 16TH MARCH 2023 6PM START. Bidding will be available by either telephone, proxy or online bidding. If you wish to bid, please register on line via the Auction House website using the Register to Bid tab"
"*Beautifully Presented And Recently Refurbished Second Floor Flat *Popular Residential Location *
*Close To Local Shops And Amenities *Two Double Bedrooms With Built In Mirrored Wardrobes *Refitted Modern Shower Room *Superb Breakfast Kitchen *Spacious Lounge/Diner With Juliette Balcony"
"""A PLEASANTLY PRESENTED SECOND FLOOR CITY CENTRE APARTMENT AVAILABLE WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN"" Comprising of own car parking space, security entry system, lounge, 2 bedrooms, fitted bathroom and a fitted kitchen ( the property has also recently been re-carpeted)"
"""A TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR FLAT CLOSE TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE"" Comprising of communal entrance hall, entrance hall, large lounge, kitchen, 2 good sized bedrooms, family bathroom. Externally there is shared communal areas."
"* A spacious 1-bedroom over 55's retirement apartment within a secure, accessible development only a short walk from the centre of Tettenhall. Boasts excellent garden views, plenty of parking, on-site resident’s facilities, and beautiful communal grounds * Hall * Kitchen * Lounge * One larg..."
"* A good-sized 1-bedroom retirement apartment on the top floor of a sought-after Tettenhall development, walkable for the village centre and enjoying garden views * Hall * Living and dining space * Kitchen * Bathroom * Sizeable master bedroom * New carpets * Resident and guest parking * Glorious ..."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* This is a purpose built second floor flat which is pleasantly situated in a nice complex of similar properties and having a range of general amenities in the area including shops, schools and public transport services."
CASH OFFERS ONLY. IDEAL FOR INVESTMENT. A unique and stylish one bedroom city centre apartment with open plan living arranged over two floors. This simply must be seen to be appreciated! Located within walking distance of Wolverhampton bus and train stations as well as city centre shops and b...
"Paul Dubberley are now in receipt of an offer for the sum of £90,000 for 53 Lewis Street Bilston WV14 7LZ. Anyone wishing to place an offer on this property should contact Paul Dubberley 69 Church Street Bilston WV14 0AX on before exchange of contracts."
Belvoir are delighted to be presenting to market this fantastic ground floor flat in the heart of Wednesfield making a perfect bungalow alternative!
"**FOR SALE VIA MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION**TWO BEDROOMS & TWO RECEPTION ROOMS***CALL FOR MORE INFORMATION** This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with theAuctioneer, iamsold Limited.This method of au..."
LEASEHOLD FLAT WITH 128 YEARS REMAINING. EPC RATED D. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. Ground rent £250 p.a. and service charges approximately £1100 p.a. This is a well-presented first-floor apartment in the popular Newbridge area of Wolverhampton. The accommodation comprises...
"LEASHOLD FLAT WITH 86 YEARS REMAINING. EPC RATED D .CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND A. . GROUND RENT £10. p.a.. Service charges vary. This is a spacious top-floor apartment in need of general cosmetic updating and modernisation. The accommodation comprises a lounge, fitted kitchen, t..."
"IDEAL FOR INVESTORS OR FIRST TIME BUYER. This Beautiful One Bedroom Ground Floor flat is being offered with an extended lease and no Ground Rent costs. Comprising of; Entrance Hall, Bedroom, Kitchen, Bathroom and lounge. This also comes with excellent transport links and local amenities."
"TOP FLOOR - 2 DOUBLE BEDROOMS - CLOSE TO AMENITIES - IDEAL BUY-TO-LET INVESTMENT - A two bedroom second floor apartment, situated within a well maintained purpose built development, only a short distance away from the city centre. In brief, the property comprises of ; entrance hallway..."
"A one bedroom first floor apartment currently tenanted and looking for a new landlord to takeover. The property comprises; entrance hall, lounge opening to kitchen area, a double bedroom and bathroom. To the front of the property is an attractive green area whilst allocated parking can be found a..."
"Situated to the North of the City and thus convenient for Wolverhampton, Wednesfield plus New Cross Hospital and Bentley Bridge. This ground floor maisonette is situated within a cul-de-sac of similar properties plus communal gardens and parking spaces. The two bedroom accommodation has double..."
* A well-situated 1-bedroom retirement apartment on the first floor of a sought-after McCarthy & Stone development for the over 55's. Enjoying a village position within easy reach of local amenities * Hall * Living and dining space * Kitchen * Bathroom * Sizeable master bedroom * Resident and gue...
"""A CHAIN FREE CITY CENTRE ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT"" Comprising of communal entrance, entrance hall, open plan lounge kitchen, family bathroom, bedroom. Externally there is 1 allocated parking space."
"Sold With Tennants in Situ. A stunning one bedroom ground floor apartment in the old girls school keeping all of its original features. The accommodation comprises of an open plan new fitted kitchen/living room bedroom, hall and fitted bathroom with shower."
Occupying a choice position in one of the most sought after locations in Tettenhall and within walking distance of Tettenhall Village this well-designed first floor apartment is an excellent example of its type in a modern development of retirement apartments.The attractive living accommodation has
We are proud to offer this Two Bedroom Duplex Flat – all interest and OFFERS are INVITED.
The Ash is a fabulous 2 bedroom apartment available via the Shared Ownership Scheme enabling you to purchase between 25%-75% of this home. The price reflects a purchase of 50 % of this home. Call to speak to one of our advisors for more information regarding qualifying for the Shared Ownership S...
"A delight to bring to market is this first floor maisonette set upon a secure gated modern development, within easy reach of Bilston Town Centre and all its local amenities of local shops and public transport. Excellent road network links are close-by giving easy access to surro..."
"First floor purpose built one bedroom modern apartment in city centre location offering no upward chain. Briefly comprising; communal stairwells and hallways, entrance hallway, living room with open aspect into kitchen, bathroom and double bedroom. The property is further benefitting..."
"Paul Carr Estate Agents are delighted to bring to market this superb two bedroom flat situated in the ever popular village of Ettingshall, Wolverhampton. An internal inspection reveals a welcoming entrance hall, spacious lounge diner, kitchen with space for appliances, two fantastic sized double ..."
**ATTENTION INVESTORS** **NO UPWARD CHAIN** Located in the city centre and within close proximity to local amenities and a number of transport links
"""A TWO BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT IN THE POPULAR RESIDENTIAL AREA OF PARKFIELDS"" Having Open Plan Kitchen, Lounge, 2 Bedrooms, Master En-suite Shower Room, Bathroom, Allocated Off-Road Parking, Well Maintained Communal Gardens and excellent transport links into Wolverhampton City centre."
A SECOND FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT Pendene Court was constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and comprises 40 properties arranged over 3 floors each served by lift. The Development Manager can be contacted from various points within each property in the case of an eme...
"Modern and well presented one bedroom apartment that is available with no onward chain. Situated in the popular Blue brick development, perfectly placed for the city centre amenities and Wolverhampton rail station."
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* Pendene Court is an impressive and attractive purpose built retirement complex constructed by McCarthy & Stone in 2000 to a high specification, set in delightfully mature and private grounds, providing a most pleasant and enjoyable living environment for persons of sixty years a..."
"Well presented one bedroom apartment situated in a popular location ideal for first time buyers or buy to let investment. The property is accessed via a secure communal entrance and comprises hallway, living room, kitchen, one double bedroom and bathroom. Allocated Parking Space. Intercom System."
"""A CHAIN FREE ONE BEDROOM SECOND FLOOR APARTMENT LOCATED CLOSE TO WOLVERHAMPTON CITY CENTRE"" Comprising communal entrance, entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, bedroom and bathroom. Externally there are communal gardens."
OFFERED TO INVESTORS ONLY. A well presented second floor apartment having secure video entry system situated in a popular residential area close to a range of amenities and convenient for Birmingham New Road/A4123. This delightful two bedroom residence is offered for sale with no upward chain and...
CALLING INVESTORS - this two-bedroom flat is offered for sale with a sitting tenant on a Periodic Assured Shorthold Tenancy Agreement achieving £595 per calendar month. Service Charge - £1072 Pa Ground Rent - £250 Pa Year remaining on lease - 79 YEARS Council Tax Band - A 
"""AN EXCELLENT OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A SPACIOUS CHAIN FREE 2 BEDROOM FLAT"" Comprising of communal entrance, entrance hall, lounge diner, fitted kitchen, two bedrooms, shower room, communal grounds and communal parking."
"""AVAILABLE FOR SHARED OWNERSHIP AT 50% A 3 BEDROOM MID-TERRACED PROPERTY BENEFITING FROM NO UPWARD CHAIN"" Comprising of entrance porch, large open plan lounge, kitchen diner, 3 bedrooms and a family bathroom. Externally there is a small front garden area and an enclosed rear garden."
"""ATTENTION CASH BUYERS - A FANTASTIC OPPORTUNITY TO PURCHASE A TWO BEDROOM GROUND FLOOR FLAT"" Comprising entrance hall, open plan lounge kitchen, two bedrooms, bathroom, communal grounds and located parking."
"A FIRST FLOOR ONE BEDROOM RETIREMENT APARTMENT OVERLOOKING COMMUNAL GARDENS Pendene Court is situated within a short distance of local shops, Doctors surgeries and with access to local bus routes via bus stop near to development. Constructed by McCarthy & Stone (Developments) Ltd and compri..."
"One bedroom second floor modern apartment situated in Wolverhampton City centre offering no upward chain. Located close to amenities, including; shops, schools, colleges and leisure facilities, with further benefits such as public transport available via bus and rail. This leasehold re..."
"** Tenanted Investment Opportunity! ** ** In excess of 8% yield! **Belvoir are delighted to present this wonderful apartment to the sales market. We are looking for Landlords to take over this new tenancy currently paying £625 PCM, resulting in a yield in excess of 8%!"
Investment Opportunity | Tenanted | No Chain | Low Maintenance | 79 Years Leasehold Remaining | EPC Rating D | Balcony | Garage Included | 8.9 % Yield
** Investment Opportunity! ** ** Fantastic Condition! ** Belvoir are pleased to present this wonderful first floor apartment to the market. This fantastic property has been maintained beautifully by the current tenant and is located close to Wolverhampton City Centre and West Park....
"**ONE BEDROOM FIRST FLOOR APARTMENT IN POPULAR CITY CENTRE LOCATION OFFERED WITH NO UPWARD CHAIN** An ideal investment opportunity located close to local amenities and within walking distance to Wolverhampton City Centre. Having allocated off-road parking, communal entrance, one double bedroom..."
"WIith ""NO UPWARD CHAIN"" this one bedroom ground floor flat is located in a convenient area with access to many local amenities and local transport networks. The flat also benefits from having off road parking, which provides space for multiple cars. "
"For Sale by Public Online Auction on 26/04/2023 12:00 . The property comprises a former cadet hall and ancillary land. The accommodation, arranged across ground floor, totals 1,049 sq ft (97.5 sq m) and includes a hall, office space, meeting rooms and toilets & kitchen. The property benefits fr..."
"For sale on 27 April 2023 The National Property Auction will be broadcast live on our website and open to remote bidding online, on the phone and by proxy. Registration for bidding will close at 5pm the day before the auction. The auction will commence at 10:00."
"NO UPWARD CHAIN . CASH BUYERS ONLY BUY- TO-LET investors Dream An immaculate, spacious and well presented two bedroomed first floor flat with resident parking to the front elevation. Ideally located in a quiet and sought after location with convenient access to transport links, Schools and l..."
"One bedroom first floor modern apartment decorated to a good standard situated within purpose built block in Wolverhampton city centre offering no upward chain. Located in the midst of the city centre, this has the advantage of being close to all sorts of useful amenities, including; shops, ..."
"**FOR SALE VIA MODERN METHOD OF AUCTION**TWO BEDROOMS***CALL FOR MORE INFORMATION** This property is for sale by the Modern Method of Auction. Should you view, offer or bid on the property, your information will be shared with theAuctioneer, iamsold Limited.This method of auction requires both pa..."
**EXCELLENT INVESTMENT PURCHASE** This first floor Maisonette is situated in a popular residential location. The property offers spacious living accommodation and is conveniently located a short distance from New Cross Hospital & other local amenities including motorway and bus routes.
"A surprisingly spacious two bedroom apartment located in the increasingly popular St Cecilias Court. Internally the accommodation offers very well proportioned rooms, and benefits from gas central heating. Residents benefit from a secure entrance and private barrier controlled car park, with one..."
Spacious two bedroom apartment providing an ideal Buy To Let opportunity with tenants in place. Situated on the 16th floor the property is ideally located for nearby New Cross Hospital and is well served by public transport. There is an allocated parking space and spacious accommodation comprisin...
"Public Notice: Address: 2 Ireton Road, Wolverhampton, WV10 8AG. We are acting in the sale of the above property and have received an offer of £72,000. Any interested parties must submit any higher offers in writing to the selling agent before an exchange of contracts takes place. EPC r..."
*EXCELLENT INVESTMENT PURCHASE* This ground floor Maisonette is situated in a popular residential location. The property offers spacious living accommodation and is conveniently located a short distance from New Cross Hospital & other local amenities including motorway and bus routes.
"Deceptively Spacious TWO Bedroom Flat located on the 7th Floor of the Popular St Cecilias Court. Spacious Apartment with accommodation comprising of Lounge, Kitchen, Two Bedrooms, Bathroom and separate WC. The property benefits from a Central Heating System and Double Glazing as well as an alloca..."
"***CASH BUYERS DUE TO SHORT LEASE*** Set behind communal entrance doors, this leasehold upper floor residence offers low maintenance living suitable for a variety of buyers whilst presenting a fine investment opportunity. In brief, the property comprises; communal entrance..."
"""OVER 55'S RETIREMENT PROPERTY"" Comprising of communal grounds, communal parking, communal entrance hall, walk way area, entrance hall, large bedroom with dressing area, good sized lounge, modern fitted kitchen, modern shower room,"
"Second floor ONE bedroom retirement apartment. This property has the advantage of no floor above and is situated at the front entrance of Grosvenor Park, overlooking the communal grounds and you can watch the world go by each day of those visiting. The accommodation compris..."
"""A WONDERFULLY PRESENTED GROUND FOOR APARTMENT LOCATED WITHIN A POPULAR DEVELOPMENT IN PENN"" Comprising entrance hall, lounge, kitchen, one bedrooms, shower room, allocated parking, communal gardens."
"Desirable first floor apartment for those aged 55 and over and being part of a development readily accessible to the City Centre, with diverse local shopping nearby plus a range of amenities in the surrounding neighbourhood including Doctors, post office, library, and bus routes.Having ..."
"Beautifully presented Ground Floor Apartment in popular retirement complex providing sheltered accommodation for the over 55s, enabling independent lifestyle within secure environment. Attractively finished with particularly well appointed specification and nicely proportioned layout comprising; ..."
"LEASEHOLD APARTMENT WITH 85 YEARS REMAINING. EPC RATED C. CITY OF WOLVERHAMPTON COUNCIL TAX BAND B. SERVICE CHARGES £1840.01, TWICE YEARLY, AND GROUND RENT £264.60 TWICE YEARLY. This is a well-presented, first-floor apartment in a popular retirement complex for the over 55s in Penn. ..."
"A Well Presented One Bedroom Flat located on the 5th Floor of the Popular St Cecilias Court. This Spacious Apartment is offered in a condition that is ready to move into, with accommodation comprising of spacious Lounge, Kitchen, Bedroom and Bathroom. The property benefits from a Central Heating ..."
"Offered With No Upward Chain A well presented one bedroomed flat occupying a quiet position with allocated parking. Accommodation comprises; Entrance hall, lounge/dining room, one double bedroom and the bathroom. The property is an ideal first time or investment purchase in a popular locati..."
RETIREMENT APARTMENT FOR THE OVER 55's - EXCELLENT CONDITION! - POPULAR LOCATION - COMMUNAL GARDENS - PARKING - A second floor retirement flat which is presented in excellent condition and specifically within a development for the over 55s in the sought after Penn area of Wolverhampton. A...
"Ground floor ONE bedroom retirement apartment. This property has the advantage of being located on the ground floor level and is situated at the front of the development at Grosvenor Park, overlooking the Penn Road so you can watch the world go by each day. Further benefitting from a g..."
*** CONNELLS LAND DEPARTMENT IS OFFERING FOR SALE A SMALL PLOT OF LAND SITUATED IN THE DESIRABLE AREA OF PENN *** This current homeowner is selling the land with the hope the potential purchaser will be able to gain planning permission for a detached dwelling.
LAND FOR SALE - Currently a gated parking area. The current homeowner is selling with the hope that the potential purchaser maybe able to gain planning permission for a single dwelling. This is all subject to building regulations and relevant planning permission. We advise any prospective purc...
"*NO UPWARD CHAIN* *OVER 55's ONLY*
Sold as seen (excluding chattels).
A well located, spacious, one bedroom flat within a sought after area which would benefit from some upgrading"
"Location: The site is bounded on Westbury Street by the Planet Night Club and on Whitmore Street by the Masjid Alrahma in Wolverhampton City Centre. Opposite the site is Broad Street Car Park, with the Ring Road (A4150) beyond that the north and east. Small pockets of terraced, residential dwel..."
